Florida, session 2026, SB522.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 175 176 Section 1.âSections 627.730, 627.731, 627.7311, 627.732, 177 627.733, 627.734, 627.736, 627.737, 627.739, 627.7401, 627.7403, 178 and 627.7405, Florida Statutes, are repealed. 179 Section 2.âSection 627.7407, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 180 Section 3.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 181 316.2122, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 182 316.2122âOperation of a low-speed vehicle, mini truck, or 183 low-speed autonomous delivery vehicle on certain roadways.â 184 (2)âThe operation of a low-speed autonomous delivery 185 vehicle on any road is authorized with the following 186 restrictions: 187 (e)âA low-speed autonomous delivery vehicle must be covered 188 by a policy of automobile insurance which provides the coverage 189 required by s. 627.749(2)(a)1. and 2. s. 627.749(2)(a)1., 2., 190 and 3. The coverage requirements of this paragraph may be 191 satisfied by automobile insurance maintained by the owner of a 192 low-speed autonomous delivery vehicle, the owner of the 193 teleoperation system, the remote human operator, or a 194 combination thereof. 195 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 316.646, Florida 196 Statutes, is amended to read: 197 316.646âSecurity required; proof of security and display 198 thereof.â 199 (1)âA Any person required by s. 324.022, s. 324.023, s. 200 324.032, s. 627.7415, s. 627.742, s. 627.748, or s. 627.7483 to 201 maintain liability security for property damage, liability 202 security, required by s. 324.023 to maintain liability security 203 for bodily injury, or death, or required by s. 627.733 to 204 maintain personal injury protection security on a motor vehicle 205 shall have in his or her immediate possession at all times while 206 operating a such motor vehicle proper proof of maintenance of 207 the required security. 208 (a)âSuch proof must shall be in a uniform paper or 209 electronic format, as prescribed by the department, a valid 210 insurance policy, an insurance policy binder, a certificate of 211 insurance, or such other proof as may be prescribed by the 212 department. 213 (b)1.âThe act of presenting to a law enforcement officer an 214 electronic device displaying proof of insurance in an electronic 215 format does not constitute consent for the officer to access any 216 information on the device other than the displayed proof of 217 insurance. 218 2.âThe person who presents the device to the officer 219 assumes the liability for any resulting damage to the device. 220 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 221 318.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 222 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 223 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 224 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 225 (2)âThirty dollars for all nonmoving traffic violations 226 and: 227 (b)âFor all violations of ss. 320.0605, 320.07(1), 322.065, 228 and 322.15(1). A Any person who is cited for a violation of s. 229 320.07(1) must shall be charged a delinquent fee pursuant to s. 230 320.07(4). 231 1.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 320.0605 232 or s. 320.07 can show proof of having a valid registration at 233 the time of arrest, the clerk of the court may dismiss the case 234 and may assess a dismissal fee of up to $10, from which the 235 clerk shall remit $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 236 into the General Revenue Fund. A person who finds it impossible 237 or impractical to obtain a valid registration certificate must 238 submit an affidavit detailing the reasons for the impossibility 239 or impracticality. The reasons may include, but are not limited 240 to, the fact that the vehicle was sold, stolen, or destroyed; 241 that the state in which the vehicle is registered does not issue 242 a certificate of registration; or that the vehicle is owned by 243 another person. 244 2.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 322.03, 245 s. 322.065, or s. 322.15 can show a driver license issued to him 246 or her and valid at the time of arrest, the clerk of the court 247 may dismiss the case and may assess a dismissal fee of up to 248 $10, from which the clerk shall remit $2.50 to the Department of 249 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 250 3.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 316.646 251 can show proof of security as required by s. 324.021(7) s. 252 627.733, issued to the person and valid at the time of arrest, 253 the clerk of the court may dismiss the case and may assess a 254 dismissal fee of up to $10, from which the clerk shall remit 255 $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 256 Revenue Fund. A person who finds it impossible or impractical to 257 obtain proof of security must submit an affidavit detailing the 258 reasons for the impracticality. The reasons may include, but are 259 not limited to, the fact that the vehicle has since been sold, 260 stolen, or destroyed; that the owner or registrant of the 261 vehicle is not required by s. 627.733 to maintain personal 262 injury protection insurance; or that the vehicle is owned by 263 another person. 264 Section 6.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (5) of 265 section 320.02, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 266 320.02âRegistration required; application for registration; 267 forms.â 268 (5)(a)âProof that bodily injury liability coverage and 269 property damage liability coverage personal injury protection 270 benefits have been purchased if required under s. 324.022, s. 271 324.032, or s. 627.742 s. 627.733, that property damage 272 liability coverage has been purchased as required under s. 273 324.022, that bodily injury liability or death coverage has been 274 purchased if required under s. 324.023, and that combined bodily 275 liability insurance and property damage liability insurance have 276 been purchased if required under s. 627.7415 must shall be 277 provided in the manner prescribed by law by the applicant at the 278 time of application for registration of any motor vehicle that 279 is subject to such requirements. The issuing agent may not shall 280 refuse to issue registration if such proof of purchase is not 281 provided. Insurers shall furnish uniform proof-of-purchase cards 282 in a paper or electronic format in a form prescribed by the 283 department and include the name of the insuredâs insurance 284 company, the coverage identification number, and the make, year, 285 and vehicle identification number of the vehicle insured. The 286 card must contain a statement notifying the applicant of the 287 penalty specified under s. 316.646(4). The card or insurance 288 policy, insurance policy binder, or certificate of insurance or 289 a photocopy of any of these; an affidavit containing the name of 290 the insuredâs insurance company, the insuredâs policy number, 291 and the make and year of the vehicle insured; or such other 292 proof as may be prescribed by the department constitutes shall 293 constitute sufficient proof of purchase. If an affidavit is 294 provided as proof, it must be in substantially the following 295 form: 296 297 Under penalty of perjury, I ...(Name of insured)... do hereby 298 certify that I have ...(bodily injury liability and Personal 299 Injury Protection, property damage liability, and, if required, 300 Bodily Injury Liability)... insurance currently in effect with 301 ...(Name of insurance company)... under ...(policy number)... 302 covering ...(make, year, and vehicle identification number of 303 vehicle).... ...(Signature of Insured)... 304 305 Such affidavit must include the following warning: 306 307 WARNING: GIVING FALSE INFORMATION IN ORDER TO OBTAIN A VEHICLE 308 REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER FLORIDA 309 LAW. ANYONE GIVING FALSE INFORMATION ON THIS AFFIDAVIT IS 310 SUBJECT TO PROSECUTION. 311 312 If an application is made through a licensed motor vehicle 313 dealer as required under s. 319.23, the original or a photocopy 314 photostatic copy of such card, insurance policy, insurance 315 policy binder, or certificate of insurance or the original 316 affidavit from the insured must shall be forwarded by the dealer 317 to the tax collector of the county or the Department of Highway 318 Safety and Motor Vehicles for processing. By executing the 319 aforesaid affidavit, a no licensed motor vehicle dealer is not 320 will be liable in damages for any inadequacy, insufficiency, or 321 falsification of any statement contained therein. A card must 322 also indicate the existence of any bodily injury liability 323 insurance voluntarily purchased. 324 (d)âThe verifying of proof of personal injury protection 325 insurance, proof of property damage liability insurance, proof 326 of combined bodily liability insurance and property damage 327 liability insurance, or proof of financial responsibility 328 insurance and the issuance or failure to issue the motor vehicle 329 registration under the provisions of this chapter may not be 330 construed in any court as a warranty of the reliability or 331 accuracy of the evidence of such proof or as meaning that the 332 provisions of any insurance policy furnished as proof of 333 financial responsibility comply with state law. Neither the 334 department nor any tax collector is liable in damages for any 335 inadequacy, insufficiency, falsification, or unauthorized 336 modification of any item of the proof of personal injury 337 protection insurance, proof of property damage liability 338 insurance, proof of combined bodily liability insurance and 339 property damage liability insurance, or proof of financial 340 responsibility before insurance prior to, during, or subsequent 341 to the verification of the proof. The issuance of a motor 342 vehicle registration does not constitute prima facie evidence or 343 a presumption of insurance coverage. 344 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 345 320.0609, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 346 320.0609âTransfer and exchange of registration license 347 plates; transfer fee.â 348 (1) 349 (b)âThe transfer of a license plate from a vehicle disposed 350 of to a newly acquired vehicle does not constitute a new 351 registration. The application for transfer must shall be 352 accepted without requiring proof of personal injury protection 353 or liability insurance. 354 Section 8.âSubsection (3) of section 320.27, Florida 355 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (g) is added to subsection 356 (1) of that section, to read: 357 320.27âMotor vehicle dealers.â 358 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âThe following words, terms, and phrases 359 when used in this section have the meanings respectively 360 ascribed to them in this subsection, except where the context 361 clearly indicates a different meaning: 362 (g)ââGarage liability insuranceâ means, beginning January 363 1, 2027, combined single-limit liability coverage, including 364 property damage and bodily injury liability coverage, in the 365 amount of at least $60,000. 366 (3)âAPPLICATION AND FEE.âThe application for the license 367 application must shall be in such form as may be prescribed by 368 the department and is shall be subject to such rules with 369 respect thereto as may be so prescribed by the department it. 370 Such application must shall be verified by oath or affirmation 371 and must shall contain a full statement of the name and birth 372 date of the person or persons applying for the license therefor; 373 the name of the firm or copartnership, with the names and places 374 of residence of all members thereof, if such applicant is a firm 375 or copartnership; the names and places of residence of the 376 principal officers, if the applicant is a body corporate or 377 other artificial body; the name of the state under whose laws 378 the corporation is organized; the present and former place or 379 places of residence of the applicant; and the prior business in 380 which the applicant has been engaged and its the location 381 thereof. The Such application must shall describe the exact 382 location of the place of business and must shall state whether 383 the place of business is owned by the applicant and when 384 acquired, or, if leased, a true copy of the lease must shall be 385 attached to the application. The applicant shall certify that 386 the location provides an adequately equipped office and is not a 387 residence; that the location affords sufficient unoccupied space 388 upon and within which adequately to store all motor vehicles 389 offered and displayed for sale; and that the location is a 390 suitable place where the applicant can in good faith carry on 391 such business and keep and maintain books, records, and files 392 necessary to conduct such business, which must shall be 393 available at all reasonable hours to inspection by the 394 department or any of its inspectors or other employees. The 395 applicant shall certify that the business of a motor vehicle 396 dealer is the principal business that will which shall be 397 conducted at that location. The application must shall contain a 398 statement that the applicant is either franchised by a 399 manufacturer of motor vehicles, in which case the name of each 400 motor vehicle that the applicant is franchised to sell must 401 shall be included, or an independent (nonfranchised) motor 402 vehicle dealer. The application must shall contain other 403 relevant information as may be required by the department. The 404 applicant shall furnish, including evidence, on a form approved 405 by the department, that the applicant is insured under a garage 406 liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance 407 policy coupled with a business automobile policy having the 408 coverages and limits of garage liability insurance coverage in 409 accordance with paragraph (1)(g), which shall include, at a 410 minimum, $25,000 combined single-limit liability coverage 411 including bodily injury and property damage protection and 412 $10,000 personal injury protection. However, a salvage motor 413 vehicle dealer as defined in subparagraph (1)(c)5. is exempt 414 from the requirements for garage liability insurance and 415 personal injury protection insurance on those vehicles that 416 cannot be legally operated on roads, highways, or streets in 417 this state. Franchise dealers must submit a garage liability 418 insurance policy, and all other dealers must submit a garage 419 liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance 420 policy coupled with a business automobile policy. Such policy 421 must shall be for the license period, and evidence of a new or 422 continued policy must shall be delivered to the department at 423 the beginning of each license period. A licensee shall deliver 424 to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, 425 within 10 calendar days after any renewal or continuation of or 426 change in such policy or within 10 calendar days after any 427 issuance of a new policy, a copy of the renewed, continued, 428 changed, or new policy. Upon making an initial application, the 429 applicant shall pay to the department a fee of $300 in addition 430 to any other fees required by law. Applicants may choose to 431 extend the licensure period for 1 additional year for a total of 432 2 years. An initial applicant shall pay to the department a fee 433 of $300 for the first year and $75 for the second year, in 434 addition to any other fees required by law. An applicant for 435 renewal shall pay to the department $75 for a 1-year renewal or 436 $150 for a 2-year renewal, in addition to any other fees 437 required by law. Upon making an application for a change of 438 location, the applicant person shall pay a fee of $50 in 439 addition to any other fees now required by law. The department 440 shall, in the case of every application for initial licensure, 441 verify whether certain facts set forth in the application are 442 true. Each applicant, general partner in the case of a 443 partnership, or corporate officer and director in the case of a 444 corporate applicant shall, must file a set of fingerprints with 445 the department for the purpose of determining any prior criminal 446 record or any outstanding warrants. The department shall submit 447 the fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 448 processing and forwarding to the Federal Bureau of Investigation 449 for federal processing. The actual cost of state and federal 450 processing must shall be borne by the applicant and is in 451 addition to the fee for licensure. The department may issue a 452 license to an applicant pending the results of the fingerprint 453 investigation, which license is fully revocable if the 454 department subsequently determines that any facts set forth in 455 the application are not true or correctly represented. 456 Section 9.âParagraph (j) of subsection (3) of section 457 320.771, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 458 320.771âLicense required of recreational vehicle dealers.â 459 (3)âAPPLICATION.âThe application for such license shall be 460 in the form prescribed by the department and subject to such 461 rules as may be prescribed by it. The application shall be 462 verified by oath or affirmation and shall contain: 463 (j)âEvidence that the applicant is insured under a garage 464 liability insurance policy as defined in s. 320.27(1)(g), which 465 shall include, at a minimum, $25,000 combined single-limit 466 liability coverage, including bodily injury and property damage 467 protection, and $10,000 personal injury protection, if the 468 applicant is to be licensed as a dealer in, or intends to sell, 469 recreational vehicles. Such policy must be for the license 470 period. Within 10 calendar days after any renewal or 471 continuation of or material change in such policy or issuance of 472 a new policy, the licensee shall deliver to the department, in a 473 manner prescribed by the department, a copy of such renewed, 474 continued, changed, or new policy. However, a garage liability 475 policy is not required for the licensure of a mobile home dealer 476 who sells only park trailers. 477 478 The department shall, if it deems necessary, cause an 479 investigation to be made to ascertain if the facts set forth in 480 the application are true and shall not issue a license to the 481 applicant until it is satisfied that the facts set forth in the 482 application are true. 483 Section 10.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 322.251, 484 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 485 322.251âNotice of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 486 disqualification of license.â 487 (1)âAll orders of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 488 disqualification issued under the provisions of this chapter, 489 chapter 318, or chapter 324 must, or ss. 627.732-627.734 shall 490 be given either by personal delivery thereof to the licensee 491 whose license is being canceled, suspended, revoked, or 492 disqualified or by deposit in the United States mail in an 493 envelope, first class, postage prepaid, addressed to the 494 licensee at his or her last known mailing address furnished to 495 the department. Such mailing by the department constitutes 496 notification, and any failure by the person to receive the 497 mailed order will not affect or stay the effective date or term 498 of the cancellation, suspension, revocation, or disqualification 499 of the licenseeâs driving privilege. 500 (2)âThe giving of notice and an order of cancellation, 501 suspension, revocation, or disqualification by mail is complete 502 upon expiration of 20 days after deposit in the United States 503 mail for all notices except those issued under chapter 324 or 504 ss. 627.732â627.734, which are complete 15 days after deposit in 505 the United States mail. Proof of the giving of notice and an 506 order of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 507 disqualification in either manner must shall be made by entry in 508 the records of the department that such notice was given. The 509 entry is admissible in the courts of this state and constitutes 510 sufficient proof that such notice was given. 511 Section 11.âParagraph (a) of subsection (8) of section 512 322.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 513 322.34âDriving while license suspended, revoked, canceled, 514 or disqualified.â 515 (8)(a)âUpon the arrest of a person for the offense of 516 driving while the personâs driver license or driving privilege 517 is suspended or revoked, the arresting officer shall determine: 518 1.âWhether the personâs driver license is suspended or 519 revoked, or the person is under suspension or revocation 520 equivalent status. 521 2.âWhether the personâs driver license has remained 522 suspended or revoked, or the person has been under suspension or 523 revocation equivalent status, since a conviction for the offense 524 of driving with a suspended or revoked license. 525 3.âWhether the suspension, revocation, or suspension or 526 revocation equivalent status was made under s. 316.646 or s. 527 627.733, relating to failure to maintain required security, or 528 under s. 322.264, relating to habitual traffic offenders. 529 4.âWhether the driver is the registered owner or co-owner 530 of the vehicle. 531 Section 12.âSection 324.011, Florida Statutes, is amended 532 to read: 533 324.011âLegislative intent; purpose of chapter.â 534 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter: 535 (a)âEnsure that the privilege of owning or operating a 536 motor vehicle in this state is exercised to recognize the 537 existing privilege to own or operate a motor vehicle on the 538 public streets and highways of this state when such vehicles are 539 used with due consideration for the safety of others and their 540 property., and to 541 (b)âPromote safety. and 542 (c)âProvide financial security requirements for such owners 543 and or operators whose responsibility it is to recompense others 544 for injury to person or property caused by the operation of a 545 motor vehicle. 546 (2)âThe purpose of this chapter is to require every owner 547 or operator of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered 548 in this state to establish, maintain, Therefore, it is required 549 herein that the operator of a motor vehicle involved in a crash 550 or convicted of certain traffic offenses meeting the operative 551 provisions of s. 324.051(2) shall respond for such damages and 552 show proof of financial ability to respond for damages arising 553 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in 554 future accidents as a requisite to owning or operating a motor 555 vehicle in this state his or her future exercise of such 556 privileges. 557 Section 13.âSubsections (1) and (7) and paragraph (c) of 558 subsection (9) of section 324.021, Florida Statutes, are 559 amended, and subsection (12) is added to that section, to read: 560 324.021âDefinitions; minimum insurance required.âThe 561 following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for 562 the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively 563 ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances 564 where the context clearly indicates a different meaning: 565 (1)âMOTOR VEHICLE.âEvery self-propelled vehicle that is 566 designed and required to be licensed for use upon a highway, 567 including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such 568 vehicles, except traction engines, road rollers, farm tractors, 569 power shovels, and well drillers, and every vehicle that is 570 propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not 571 operated upon rails, but not including any personal delivery 572 device or mobile carrier as defined in s. 316.003, bicycle, 573 electric bicycle, or moped. However, the term âmotor vehicleâ 574 does not include a motor vehicle as defined in s. 627.732(3) 575 when the owner of such vehicle has complied with the 576 requirements of ss. 627.730-627.7405, inclusive, unless the 577 provisions of s. 324.051 apply; and, in such case, the 578 applicable proof of insurance provisions of s. 320.02 apply. 579 (7)âPROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY.âBeginning January 1, 580 2027, That proof of ability to respond in damages for liability 581 on account of crashes arising out of the ownership, maintenance, 582 or use of a motor vehicle: 583 (a)âWith respect to a motor vehicle other than a commercial 584 motor vehicle, nonpublic sector bus, or for-hire passenger 585 transportation vehicle, in the amounts specified in s. 586 324.022(1). in the amount of $10,000 because of bodily injury 587 to, or death of, one person in any one crash; 588 (b)âSubject to such limits for one person, in the amount of 589 $20,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of, two or more 590 persons in any one crash; 591 (c)âIn the amount of $10,000 because of injury to, or 592 destruction of, property of others in any one crash; and 593 (b)(d)âWith respect to commercial motor vehicles and 594 nonpublic sector buses, in the amounts specified in s. 627.7415 595 ss. 627.7415 and 627.742, respectively. 596 (c)âWith respect to nonpublic sector buses, in the amounts 597 specified in s. 627.742. 598 (d)âWith respect to for-hire passenger transportation 599 vehicles, in the amounts specified in s. 324.032. 600 (9)âOWNER; OWNER/LESSOR; APPLICATION.â 601 (c)âApplication.â 602 1.âThe limits on liability in subparagraphs (b)2. and 3. do 603 not apply to an owner of motor vehicles that are used for 604 commercial activity in the ownerâs ordinary course of business, 605 other than a rental company that rents or leases motor vehicles. 606 For purposes of this paragraph, the term ârental companyâ 607 includes only an entity that is engaged in the business of 608 renting or leasing motor vehicles to the general public and that 609 rents or leases a majority of its motor vehicles to persons with 610 no direct or indirect affiliation with the rental company. The 611 term ârental companyâ also includes: 612 a.âA related rental or leasing company that is a subsidiary 613 of the same parent company as that of the renting or leasing 614 company that rented or leased the vehicle. 615 b.âThe holder of a motor vehicle title or an equity 616 interest in a motor vehicle title if the title or equity 617 interest is held pursuant to or to facilitate an asset-backed 618 securitization of a fleet of motor vehicles used solely in the 619 business of renting or leasing motor vehicles to the general 620 public and under the dominion and control of a rental company, 621 as described in this subparagraph, in the operation of such 622 rental companyâs business. 623 2.âFurthermore, with respect to commercial motor vehicles 624 as defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01(25) s. 627.732, the limits 625 on liability in subparagraphs (b)2. and 3. do not apply if, at 626 the time of the incident, the commercial motor vehicle is being 627 used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous 628 for the purposes of the Hazardous Materials Transportation 629 Authorization Act of 1994, as amended, 49 U.S.C. ss. 5101 et 630 seq., and that is required pursuant to such act to carry 631 placards warning others of the hazardous cargo, unless at the 632 time of lease or rental either: 633 a.âThe lessee indicates in writing that the vehicle will 634 not be used to transport materials found to be hazardous for the 635 purposes of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Authorization 636 Act of 1994, as amended, 49 U.S.C. ss. 5101 et seq.; or 637 b.âThe lessee or other operator of the commercial motor 638 vehicle has in effect insurance with limits of at least $5 639 million $5,000,000 combined property damage and bodily injury 640 liability. 641 3.a.âA motor vehicle dealer, or a motor vehicle dealerâs 642 leasing or rental affiliate, that provides a temporary 643 replacement vehicle at no charge or at a reasonable daily charge 644 to a service customer whose vehicle is being held for repair, 645 service, or adjustment by the motor vehicle dealer is immune 646 from any cause of action and is not liable, vicariously or 647 directly, under general law solely by reason of being the owner 648 of the temporary replacement vehicle for harm to persons or 649 property that arises out of the use, or operation, of the 650 temporary replacement vehicle by any person during the period 651 the temporary replacement vehicle has been entrusted to the 652 motor vehicle dealerâs service customer if there is no 653 negligence or criminal wrongdoing on the part of the motor 654 vehicle owner, or its leasing or rental affiliate. 655 b.âFor purposes of this section, and notwithstanding any 656 other provision of general law, a motor vehicle dealer, or a 657 motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental affiliate, that gives 658 possession, control, or use of a temporary replacement vehicle 659 to a motor vehicle dealerâs service customer may not be adjudged 660 liable in a civil proceeding absent negligence or criminal 661 wrongdoing on the part of the motor vehicle dealer, or the motor 662 vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental affiliate, if the motor 663 vehicle dealer or the motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental 664 affiliate executes a written rental or use agreement and obtains 665 from the person receiving the temporary replacement vehicle a 666 copy of the personâs driver license and insurance information 667 reflecting at least the minimum motor vehicle insurance coverage 668 required in the state. Any subsequent determination that the 669 driver license or insurance information provided to the motor 670 vehicle dealer, or the motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental 671 affiliate, was in any way false, fraudulent, misleading, 672 nonexistent, canceled, not in effect, or invalid does not alter 673 or diminish the protections provided by this section, unless the 674 motor vehicle dealer, or the motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or 675 rental affiliate, had actual knowledge thereof at the time 676 possession of the temporary replacement vehicle was provided. 677 c.âFor purposes of this subparagraph, the term: 678 (I)ââControlâ means the power to direct the management and 679 policies of a person, whether through ownership of voting 680 securities or otherwise. 681 (II)ââMotor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental affiliateâ 682 means a person who directly or indirectly controls, is 683 controlled by, or is under common control with the motor vehicle 684 dealer. 685 d.âFor purposes of this subparagraph, the term âservice 686 customerâ does not include an agent or a principal of a motor 687 vehicle dealer or a motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental 688 affiliate, and does not include an employee of a motor vehicle 689 dealer or a motor vehicle dealerâs leasing or rental affiliate 690 unless the employee was provided a temporary replacement 691 vehicle: 692 (I)âWhile the employeeâs personal vehicle was being held 693 for repair, service, or adjustment by the motor vehicle dealer; 694 (II)âIn the same manner as other customers who are provided 695 a temporary replacement vehicle while the customerâs vehicle is 696 being held for repair, service, or adjustment; and 697 (III)âThe employee was not acting within the course and 698 scope of his or her employment. 699 (12)âFOR-HIRE PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION VEHICLE.âEvery for 700 hire vehicle as defined in s. 320.01(15) which is offered or 701 used to provide transportation for persons, including taxicabs, 702 limousines, and jitneys. 703 Section 14.âSection 324.022, Florida Statutes, is amended 704 to read: 705 324.022âFinancial responsibility requirements for property 706 damage.â 707 (1)(a)âBeginning January 1, 2027, every owner or operator 708 of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state shall 709 establish and continuously maintain the ability to respond in 710 damages for liability on account of accidents arising out of the 711 ownership, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle in the 712 amount of: 713 1.âTwenty-five thousand dollars for bodily injury to, or 714 the death of, one person in any one crash and, subject to such 715 limits for one person, in the amount of $50,000 for bodily 716 injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one 717 crash; and 718 2.âTen thousand dollars for $10,000 because of damage to, 719 or destruction of, property of others in any one crash. 720 (b)âThe requirements of paragraph (a) this section may be 721 met by one of the methods established in s. 324.031; by self 722 insuring as authorized by s. 768.28(16); or by maintaining a 723 motor vehicle liability policy that an insurance policy 724 providing coverage for property damage liability in the amount 725 of at least $10,000 because of damage to, or destruction of, 726 property of others in any one accident arising out of the use of 727 the motor vehicle. The requirements of this section may also be 728 met by having a policy which provides combined property damage 729 liability and bodily injury liability coverage for any one crash 730 arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor 731 vehicle and that conforms to the requirements of s. 324.151 in 732 the amount of at least $60,000 for every owner or operator 733 subject to the financial responsibility required in paragraph 734 (a) $30,000 for combined property damage liability and bodily 735 injury liability for any one crash arising out of the use of the 736 motor vehicle. The policy, with respect to coverage for property 737 damage liability, must meet the applicable requirements of s. 738 324.151, subject to the usual policy exclusions that have been 739 approved in policy forms by the Office of Insurance Regulation. 740 No insurer shall have any duty to defend uncovered claims 741 irrespective of their joinder with covered claims. 742 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 743 (a)ââMotor vehicleâ means any self-propelled vehicle that 744 has four or more wheels and that is of a type designed and 745 required to be licensed for use on the highways of this state, 746 and any trailer or semitrailer designed for use with such 747 vehicle. The term does not include the following: 748 1.âA mobile home as defined in s. 320.01(2)(a). 749 2.âA motor vehicle that is used in mass transit and 750 designed to transport more than five passengers, exclusive of 751 the operator of the motor vehicle, and that is owned by a 752 municipality, transit authority, or political subdivision of the 753 state. 754 3.âA school bus as defined in s. 1006.25, which must 755 maintain security as required under s. 316.615. 756 4.âA commercial motor vehicle as defined in s. 207.002 or 757 s. 320.01(25), which must maintain security as required under 758 ss. 324.031 and 627.7415. 759 5.âA nonpublic sector bus, which must maintain security as 760 required under ss. 324.031 and 627.742. 761 6.4.âA vehicle providing for-hire passenger transportation 762 vehicle, which must that is subject to the provisions of s. 763 324.031. A taxicab shall maintain security as required under s. 764 324.032 s. 324.032(1). 765 7.5.âA personal delivery device as defined in s. 316.003, 766 which must maintain security as required under s. 316.2071(4). 767 (b)ââOwnerâ means the person who holds legal title to a 768 motor vehicle or the debtor or lessee who has the right to 769 possession of a motor vehicle that is the subject of a security 770 agreement or lease with an option to purchase. 771 (3)âEach nonresident owner or registrant of a motor vehicle 772 that, whether operated or not, has been physically present 773 within this state for more than 90 days during the preceding 365 774 days shall maintain security as required by subsection (1). The 775 security must be that is in effect continuously throughout the 776 period the motor vehicle remains within this state. 777 (4)âAn The owner or registrant of a motor vehicle who is 778 exempt from the requirements of this section if she or he is a 779 member of the United States Armed Forces and is called to or on 780 active duty outside the United States in an emergency situation 781 is exempt from this section while he or she. The exemption 782 provided by this subsection applies only as long as the member 783 of the Armed Forces is on such active duty. This exemption 784 outside the United States and applies only while the vehicle 785 covered by the security is not operated by any person. Upon 786 receipt of a written request by the insured to whom the 787 exemption provided in this subsection applies, the insurer shall 788 cancel the coverages and return any unearned premium or suspend 789 the security required by this section. Notwithstanding s. 790 324.0221(2) s. 324.0221(3), the department may not suspend the 791 registration or operatorâs license of an any owner or registrant 792 of a motor vehicle during the time she or he qualifies for the 793 an exemption under this subsection. An Any owner or registrant 794 of a motor vehicle who qualifies for the an exemption under this 795 subsection shall immediately notify the department before prior 796 to and at the end of the expiration of the exemption. 797 Section 15.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 324.0221, 798 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 799 324.0221âReports by insurers to the department; suspension 800 of driver license and vehicle registrations; reinstatement.â 801 (1)(a)âEach insurer that has issued a policy providing 802 personal injury protection coverage or property damage liability 803 coverage shall report the cancellation or nonrenewal thereof to 804 the department within 10 days after the processing date or 805 effective date of each cancellation or nonrenewal. Upon the 806 issuance of a policy providing personal injury protection 807 coverage or property damage liability coverage to a named 808 insured not previously insured by the insurer during that 809 calendar year, the insurer shall report the issuance of the new 810 policy to the department within 10 days. The report must shall 811 be in the form and format and contain any information required 812 by the department and must be provided in a format that is 813 compatible with the data processing capabilities of the 814 department. Failure by an insurer to file proper reports with 815 the department as required by this subsection constitutes a 816 violation of the Florida Insurance Code. These records may shall 817 be used by the department only for enforcement and regulatory 818 purposes, including the generation by the department of data 819 regarding compliance by owners of motor vehicles with the 820 requirements for financial responsibility coverage. 821 (b)âWith respect to an insurance policy providing personal 822 injury protection coverage or property damage liability 823 coverage, each insurer shall notify the named insured, or the 824 first-named insured in the case of a commercial fleet policy, in 825 writing that any cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy will 826 be reported by the insurer to the department. The notice must 827 also inform the named insured that failure to maintain bodily 828 injury liability personal injury protection coverage and 829 property damage liability coverage on a motor vehicle when 830 required by law may result in the loss of registration and 831 driving privileges in this state and inform the named insured of 832 the amount of the reinstatement fees required by this section. 833 This notice is for informational purposes only, and an insurer 834 is not civilly liable for failing to provide this notice. 835 (2)âThe department shall suspend, after due notice and an 836 opportunity to be heard, the registration and driver license of 837 any owner or registrant of a motor vehicle for with respect to 838 which security is required under s. 324.022, s. 324.023, s. 839 324.032, s. 627.7415, or s. 627.742 ss. 324.022 and 627.733 840 upon: 841 (a)âThe departmentâs records showing that the owner or 842 registrant of such motor vehicle does did not have the in full 843 force and effect when required security in full force and effect 844 that complies with the requirements of ss. 324.022 and 627.733; 845 or 846 (b)âNotification by the insurer to the department, in a 847 form approved by the department, of cancellation or termination 848 of the required security. 849 Section 16.âSection 324.0222, Florida Statutes, is created 850 to read: 851 324.0222âApplication of driver license and registration 852 suspensions for failure to maintain security; reinstatement.âAll 853 suspensions of driver licenses or motor vehicle registrations 854 for failure to maintain security as required by law in effect 855 before January 1, 2027, remain in full force and effect after 856 January 1, 2027. A driver may effect reinstatement of a 857 suspended driver license or registration as provided under s. 858 324.0221. 859 Section 17.âSection 324.023, Florida Statutes, is amended 860 to read: 861 324.023âFinancial responsibility for bodily injury or 862 death.âIn addition to any other financial responsibility 863 required by law, every owner or operator of a motor vehicle that 864 is required to be registered in this state, or that is located 865 within this state, and who, regardless of adjudication of guilt, 866 has been found guilty of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo 867 contendere to a charge of driving under the influence under s. 868 316.193 after October 1, 2007, shall, by one of the methods 869 established in s. 324.031(1)(a) or (b) s. 324.031(1) or (2), 870 establish and maintain the ability to respond in damages for 871 liability on account of accidents arising out of the ownership, 872 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in the amount of $100,000 873 because of bodily injury to, or death of, one person in any one 874 crash and, subject to such limits for one person, in the amount 875 of $300,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of, two or 876 more persons in any one crash and in the amount of $50,000 877 because of property damage in any one crash. If the owner or 878 operator chooses to establish and maintain such ability by 879 furnishing a certificate of deposit pursuant to s. 324.031(1)(b) 880 s. 324.031(2), such certificate of deposit must be at least 881 $350,000. Such higher limits must be carried for a minimum 882 period of 3 years. If the owner or operator has not been 883 convicted of driving under the influence or a felony traffic 884 offense for a period of 3 years from the date of reinstatement 885 of driving privileges for a violation of s. 316.193, the owner 886 or operator is shall be exempt from this section. 887 Section 18.âSection 324.031, Florida Statutes, is amended 888 to read: 889 324.031âManner of proving financial responsibility.â 890 (1)âThe owner or operator of a taxicab, limousine, jitney, 891 or any other for-hire passenger transportation vehicle may prove 892 financial responsibility by providing satisfactory evidence of 893 holding a motor vehicle liability policy as defined in s. 894 324.021(8) or s. 324.151, which policy is issued by an insurance 895 carrier which is a member of the Florida Insurance Guaranty 896 Association. The owner or operator of a motor vehicle other than 897 a for-hire passenger transportation operator or owner of any 898 other vehicle may prove his or her financial responsibility by: 899 (a)(1)âFurnishing satisfactory evidence of holding a motor 900 vehicle liability policy as defined in ss. 324.021(8) and 901 324.151 which provides liability coverage for the motor vehicle 902 being operated; 903 (b)(2)âFurnishing a certificate of self-insurance showing a 904 deposit of cash in accordance with s. 324.161; or 905 (c)(3)âFurnishing a certificate of self-insurance issued by 906 the department in accordance with s. 324.171. 907 (2)âBeginning January 1, 2027, any person, including any 908 firm, partnership, association, corporation, or other person, 909 other than a natural person, electing to use the method of proof 910 specified in paragraph (1)(b) subsection (2) shall do all of the 911 following: 912 (a)âFurnish a certificate of deposit equal to the number of 913 vehicles owned times $60,000 $30,000, up to a maximum of 914 $240,000. $120,000; 915 (b)âIn addition, any such person, other than a natural 916 person, shall Maintain insurance providing coverage that meets 917 the requirements of s. 324.151 and has in excess of limits of: 918 1.âAt least $125,000 for bodily injury to, or the death of, 919 one person in any one crash; subject to such limits for one 920 person, at least $250,000 for bodily injury to, or the death of, 921 two or more persons in any one crash; and $50,000 of property 922 damage coverage for damage to, or destruction of, property of 923 others in any one crash; or 924 2.âAt least $300,000 for combined bodily injury liability 925 and property damage liability for any one crash 926 $10,000/20,000/10,000 or $30,000 combined single limits, and 927 such excess insurance shall provide minimum limits of 928 $125,000/250,000/50,000 or $300,000 combined single limits. 929 These increased limits shall not affect the requirements for 930 proving financial responsibility under s. 324.032(1). 931 Section 19.âSection 324.032, Florida Statutes, is amended 932 to read: 933 324.032âManner of proving Financial responsibility for; 934 for-hire passenger transportation vehicles.âNotwithstanding the 935 provisions of s. 324.031: 936 (1)âAn owner or a lessee of a for-hire passenger 937 transportation vehicle that is required to be registered in this 938 state shall establish and continuously maintain the ability to 939 respond in damages for liability on account of accidents arising 940 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the for-hire 941 passenger transportation vehicle, in the amount of: 942 (a)âOne hundred twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily 943 injury to, or the death of, one person in any one crash and, 944 subject to such limits for one person, in the amount of $250,000 945 for bodily injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in 946 any one crash; and A person who is either the owner or a lessee 947 required to maintain insurance under s. 627.733(1)(b) and who 948 operates one or more taxicabs, limousines, jitneys, or any other 949 for-hire passenger transportation vehicles may prove financial 950 responsibility by furnishing satisfactory evidence of holding a 951 motor vehicle liability policy, but with minimum limits of 952 $125,000/250,000/50,000. 953 (b)âFifty thousand dollars for damage to, or destruction 954 of, property of others in any one crash A person who is either 955 the owner or a lessee required to maintain insurance under s. 956 324.021(9)(b) and who operates limousines, jitneys, or any other 957 for-hire passenger vehicles, other than taxicabs, may prove 958 financial responsibility by furnishing satisfactory evidence of 959 holding a motor vehicle liability policy as defined in s. 960 324.031. 961 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (3), the requirements 962 of this section must be met by the owner or lessee providing 963 satisfactory evidence of holding a motor vehicle liability 964 policy conforming to the requirements of s. 324.151 which is 965 issued by an insurance carrier that is a member of the Florida 966 Insurance Guaranty Association. 967 (3)âAn owner or a lessee who is required to maintain 968 insurance under s. 324.021(9)(b) and who operates at least 300 969 taxicabs, limousines, jitneys, or any other for-hire passenger 970 transportation vehicles may provide financial responsibility by 971 complying with the provisions of s. 324.171, which must such 972 compliance to be demonstrated by maintaining at its principal 973 place of business an audited financial statement, prepared in 974 accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and 975 providing to the department a certification issued by a 976 certified public accountant that the applicantâs net worth is at 977 least equal to the requirements of s. 324.171 as determined by 978 the Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services 979 Commission, including claims liabilities in an amount certified 980 as adequate by a Fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society. 981 982 Upon request by the department, the applicant shall must provide 983 the department at the applicantâs principal place of business in 984 this state access to the applicantâs underlying financial 985 information and financial statements that provide the basis of 986 the certified public accountantâs certification. The applicant 987 shall reimburse the requesting department for all reasonable 988 costs incurred by it in reviewing the supporting information. 989 The maximum amount of self-insurance permissible under this 990 subsection is $300,000 and must be stated on a per-occurrence 991 basis, and the applicant shall maintain adequate excess 992 insurance issued by an authorized or eligible insurer licensed 993 or approved by the Office of Insurance Regulation. All risks 994 self-insured shall remain with the owner or lessee providing it, 995 and the risks are not transferable to any other person, unless a 996 policy complying with subsections (1) and (2) subsection (1) is 997 obtained. 998 Section 20.âSubsection (2) of section 324.051, Florida 999 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) is added to that 1000 section, to read: 1001 324.051âReports of crashes; suspensions of licenses and 1002 registrations.â 1003 (2)(a)âThirty days after receipt of notice of any accident 1004 described in paragraph (1)(a) involving a motor vehicle within 1005 this state, the department shall suspend, after due notice and 1006 opportunity to be heard, the license of each operator and all 1007 registrations of the owner of the vehicles operated by such 1008 operator whether or not involved in such crash and, in the case 1009 of a nonresident owner or operator, shall suspend such 1010 nonresidentâs operating privilege in this state, unless such 1011 operator or owner shall, prior to the expiration of such 30 1012 days, be found by the department to be exempt from the operation 1013 of this chapter, based upon evidence satisfactory to the 1014 department that: 1015 1.âThe motor vehicle was legally parked at the time of such 1016 crash. 1017 2.âThe motor vehicle was owned by the United States 1018 Government, this state, or any political subdivision of this 1019 state or any municipality therein. 1020 3.âSuch operator or owner has secured a duly acknowledged 1021 written agreement providing for release from liability by all 1022 parties injured as the result of such said crash and has 1023 complied with one of the provisions of s. 324.031. 1024 4.âSuch operator or owner has deposited with the department 1025 security to conform with s. 324.061 when applicable and has 1026 complied with one of the provisions of s. 324.031. 1027 5.âOne year has elapsed since such owner or operator was 1028 suspended pursuant to subsection (3), the owner or operator has 1029 complied with one of the provisions of s. 324.031, and no bill 1030 of complaint of which the department has notice has been filed 1031 in a court of competent jurisdiction. 1032 (b)âThis subsection does shall not apply: 1033 1.âTo such operator or owner if such operator or owner had 1034 in effect at the time of such crash or traffic conviction a 1035 motor vehicle an automobile liability policy with respect to all 1036 of the registered motor vehicles owned by such operator or 1037 owner. 1038 2.âTo such operator, if not the owner of such motor 1039 vehicle, if there was in effect at the time of such crash or 1040 traffic conviction a motor vehicle an automobile liability 1041 policy or bond with respect to his or her operation of motor 1042 vehicles not owned by him or her. 1043 3.âTo such operator or owner if the liability of such 1044 operator or owner for damages resulting from such crash is, in 1045 the judgment of the department, covered by any other form of 1046 liability insurance or bond. 1047 4.âTo any person who has obtained from the department a 1048 certificate of self-insurance, in accordance with s. 324.171, or 1049 to any person operating a motor vehicle for such self-insurer. 1050 1051 A No such policy or bond is not shall be effective under this 1052 subsection unless it contains limits of not less than those 1053 specified in s. 324.021(7). 1054 (4)âAs used in this section, the term âmotor vehicleâ 1055 includes a motorcycle as defined in s. 320.01(26). 1056 Section 21.âSection 324.071, Florida Statutes, is amended 1057 to read: 1058 324.071âReinstatement; renewal of license; reinstatement 1059 fee.âAn Any operator or owner whose license or registration has 1060 been suspended pursuant to s. 324.051(2), s. 324.072, s. 1061 324.081, or s. 324.121 may effect its reinstatement upon 1062 compliance with the provisions of s. 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., or 1063 s. 324.081(2) and (3), as the case may be, and with one of the 1064 provisions of s. 324.031 and upon payment to the department of a 1065 nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $15. Only one such fee may 1066 shall be paid by any one person regardless irrespective of the 1067 number of licenses and registrations to be then reinstated or 1068 issued to such person. All Such fees must shall be deposited in 1069 to a department trust fund. If When the reinstatement of any 1070 license or registration is effected by compliance with s. 1071 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., the department may shall not renew the 1072 license or registration within a period of 3 years after from 1073 such reinstatement, and no nor shall any other license or 1074 registration may be issued in the name of such person, unless 1075 the operator continues is continuing to comply with one of the 1076 provisions of s. 324.031. 1077 Section 22.âSubsection (1) of section 324.091, Florida 1078 Statutes, is amended to read: 1079 324.091âNotice to department; notice to insurer.â 1080 (1)âEach owner and operator involved in a crash or 1081 conviction case within the purview of this chapter shall furnish 1082 evidence of automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle 1083 liability insurance within 14 days after the date of the mailing 1084 of notice of crash by the department in the form and manner as 1085 it may designate. Upon receipt of evidence that a an automobile 1086 liability policy or motor vehicle liability policy was in effect 1087 at the time of the crash or conviction case, the department 1088 shall forward to the insurer such information for verification 1089 in a method as determined by the department. The insurer shall 1090 respond to the department within 20 days after the notice as to 1091 whether or not such information is valid. If the department 1092 determines that a an automobile liability policy or motor 1093 vehicle liability policy was not in effect and did not provide 1094 coverage for both the owner and the operator, it must shall take 1095 action as it is authorized to do under this chapter. 1096 Section 23.âSection 324.151, Florida Statutes, is amended 1097 to read: 1098 324.151âMotor vehicle liability policies; required 1099 provisions.â 1100 (1)âA motor vehicle liability policy that serves as to be 1101 proof of financial responsibility under s. 324.031(1)(a) must s. 1102 324.031(1) shall be issued to owners or operators of motor 1103 vehicles under the following provisions: 1104 (a)âA motor vehicle An ownerâs liability insurance policy 1105 issued to an owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered 1106 in this state must designate by explicit description or by 1107 appropriate reference all motor vehicles for with respect to 1108 which coverage is thereby granted. The policy, must insure the 1109 person or persons owner named therein, and, unless except for a 1110 named driver excluded under s. 627.747, must insure any resident 1111 relative of a named insured other person as operator using such 1112 motor vehicle or motor vehicles with the express or implied 1113 permission of such owner against loss from the liability imposed 1114 by law for damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or 1115 use of any such motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the 1116 United States or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits, 1117 exclusive of interest and costs with respect to each such motor 1118 vehicle as is provided for under s. 324.021(7). The policy must 1119 also insure any person operating an insured motor vehicle with 1120 the express or implied permission of a named insured against 1121 loss from the liability imposed by law for damage arising out of 1122 the ownership, maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle, unless 1123 that person was excluded under s. 627.747. However, the insurer 1124 may include provisions in its policy excluding liability 1125 coverage for a motor vehicle not designated as an insured 1126 vehicle on the policy if such motor vehicle does not qualify as 1127 a newly acquired vehicle or as a temporary substitute vehicle 1128 and was owned by the insured or was furnished for an insuredâs 1129 regular use for more than 30 consecutive days before the event 1130 giving rise to the claim. Insurers may make available, with 1131 respect to property damage liability coverage, a deductible 1132 amount not to exceed $500. In the event of a property damage 1133 loss covered by a policy containing a property damage deductible 1134 provision, the insurer shall pay to the third-party claimant the 1135 amount of any property damage liability settlement or judgment, 1136 subject to policy limits, as if no deductible existed. 1137 (b)âA motor vehicle liability policy issued to a person who 1138 does not own a An operatorâs motor vehicle must liability policy 1139 of insurance shall insure the person or persons named therein 1140 against loss from the liability imposed upon him or her by law 1141 for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use by 1142 the person of any motor vehicle not owned by him or her, with 1143 the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of 1144 liability as referred to above with respect to an ownerâs policy 1145 of liability insurance. 1146 (c)âAll such motor vehicle liability policies must provide 1147 liability coverage with limits, exclusive of interest and costs, 1148 greater than or equal to the limits specified under s. 1149 324.021(7) for accidents occurring within the United States and 1150 Canada. The policies must shall state the name and address of 1151 the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the 1152 premium charged therefor, the policy period, and the limits of 1153 liability, and must shall contain an agreement or be endorsed 1154 that insurance is provided in accordance with the coverage 1155 defined in this chapter as respects bodily injury and death or 1156 property damage or both and is subject to all provisions of this 1157 chapter. The Said policies must shall also contain a provision 1158 that the satisfaction by an insured of a judgment for such 1159 injury or damage may shall not be a condition precedent to the 1160 right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on 1161 account of such injury or damage, and must shall also contain a 1162 provision that bankruptcy or insolvency of the insured or of the 1163 insuredâs estate does shall not relieve the insurance carrier of 1164 any of its obligations under the said policy. 1165 (2)âThe provisions of This section is shall not be 1166 applicable to any motor vehicle automobile liability policy 1167 unless and until it is furnished as proof of financial 1168 responsibility for the future pursuant to s. 324.031, and then 1169 it applies only from and after the date the said policy is so 1170 furnished and thereafter. 1171 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 1172 (a)ââNewly acquired vehicleâ means a vehicle owned by a 1173 named insured or a resident relative of the named insured which 1174 was acquired no more than 30 days before an accident. 1175 (b)ââResident relativeâ means a person related to a named 1176 insured by any degree by blood, marriage, or adoption, including 1177 a ward or foster child, who makes his or her home in the same 1178 family unit or residence as the named insured, regardless of 1179 whether he or she temporarily lives elsewhere. 1180 (c)ââTemporary substitute vehicleâ means any motor vehicle 1181 that is not owned by the named insured and that is temporarily 1182 used with the permission of the owner as a substitute for the 1183 owned motor vehicle designated on the policy when the owned 1184 vehicle is withdrawn from normal use because of breakdown, 1185 repair, servicing, loss, or destruction. 1186 Section 24.âSection 324.161, Florida Statutes, is amended 1187 to read: 1188 324.161âProof of financial responsibility; deposit.âIf a 1189 person elects to prove his or her financial responsibility under 1190 the method of proof specified in s. 324.031(1)(b), he or she 1191 annually must obtain and submit to the department proof of a 1192 certificate of deposit in the amount required under s. 1193 324.031(2) from a financial institution insured by the Federal 1194 Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union 1195 Administration Annually, before any certificate of insurance may 1196 be issued to a person, including any firm, partnership, 1197 association, corporation, or other person, other than a natural 1198 person, proof of a certificate of deposit of $30,000 issued and 1199 held by a financial institution must be submitted to the 1200 department. A power of attorney will be issued to and held by 1201 the department, and may be executed upon a judgment issued 1202 against such person making the deposit, for damages for because 1203 of bodily injury to or death of any person or for damages for 1204 because of injury to or destruction of property resulting from 1205 the use or operation of any motor vehicle occurring after such 1206 deposit was made. Money so deposited is shall not be subject to 1207 attachment or execution unless such attachment or execution 1208 arises shall arise out of a lawsuit suit for such damages as 1209 aforesaid. 1210 Section 25.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 324.171, 1211 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1212 324.171âSelf-insurer.â 1213 (1)âA Any person may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining 1214 a certificate of self-insurance from the department. which may, 1215 in its discretion and Upon application of such a person, the 1216 department may issue a said certificate of self-insurance to an 1217 applicant who satisfies when such person has satisfied the 1218 requirements of this section. Effective January 1, 2027 to 1219 qualify as a self-insurer under this section: 1220 (a)âA private individual with private passenger vehicles 1221 shall possess a net unencumbered worth of at least $100,000 1222 $40,000. 1223 (b)âA person, including any firm, partnership, association, 1224 corporation, or other person, other than a natural person, 1225 shall: 1226 1.âPossess a net unencumbered worth of at least $100,000 1227 $40,000 for the first motor vehicle and $50,000 $20,000 for each 1228 additional motor vehicle; or 1229 2.âMaintain sufficient net worth, in an amount determined 1230 by the department, to be financially responsible for potential 1231 losses. The department, with the assistance of the Office of 1232 Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services Commission, shall 1233 annually determine the minimum net worth sufficient to satisfy 1234 this subparagraph as determined annually by the department, 1235 pursuant to rules adopted promulgated by the department, with 1236 the assistance of the Office of Insurance Regulation of the 1237 Financial Services Commission, to be financially responsible for 1238 potential losses. The rules must consider any shall take into 1239 consideration excess insurance carried by the applicant. The 1240 departmentâs determination must shall be based upon reasonable 1241 actuarial principles considering the frequency, severity, and 1242 loss development of claims incurred by casualty insurers writing 1243 coverage on the type of motor vehicles for which a certificate 1244 of self-insurance is desired. 1245 (c)âThe owner of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in 1246 s. 207.002 or s. 320.01(25) s. 320.01, may qualify as a self 1247 insurer subject to the standards provided for in subparagraph 1248 (b)2. 1249 (2)âThe self-insurance certificate must shall provide 1250 limits of liability insurance in the amounts specified under s. 1251 324.021(7) or s. 627.7415 and shall provide personal injury 1252 protection coverage under s. 627.733(3)(b). 1253 Section 26.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 324.242, 1254 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1255 324.242âPersonal injury protection and property damage 1256 liability insurance policies; public records exemption.â 1257 (1)âThe following information regarding personal injury 1258 protection and property damage liability insurance policies held 1259 by the department is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 1260 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 1261 (a)âPersonal identifying information of an insured or 1262 former insured; and 1263 (b)âAn insurance policy number. 1264 (3)âThe department shall provide personal injury protection 1265 and property damage liability insurance policy numbers to 1266 department-approved third parties that provide data collection 1267 services to an insurer of any person involved in such accident. 1268 Section 27.âSection 324.251, Florida Statutes, is amended 1269 to read: 1270 324.251âShort title.âThis chapter may be cited as the 1271 âFinancial Responsibility Law of 2026 1955â and is shall become 1272 effective at 12:01 a.m., January 1, 2027 October 1, 1955. 1273 Section 28.âSubsection (4) of section 400.9905, Florida 1274 Statutes, is amended to read: 1275 400.9905âDefinitions.â 1276 (4)(a)ââClinicâ means an entity where health care services 1277 are provided to individuals and which tenders charges for 1278 reimbursement for such services, including a mobile clinic and a 1279 portable equipment provider. As used in this part, the term does 1280 not include and the licensure requirements of this part do not 1281 apply to: 1282 1.(a)âEntities licensed or registered by the state under 1283 chapter 395; entities licensed or registered by the state and 1284 providing only health care services within the scope of services 1285 authorized under their respective licenses under ss. 383.30 1286 383.332, chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter 1287 except part X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 1288 466, chapter 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal 1289 disease providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers 1290 certified and providing only health care services within the 1291 scope of services authorized under their respective 1292 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H, 1293 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care 1294 services within the scope of services authorized under their 1295 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; 1296 providers certified and providing only health care services 1297 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 1298 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 1299 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 1300 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 1301 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 1302 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 1303 services or other health care services by licensed practitioners 1304 solely within a hospital licensed under chapter 395. 1305 2.(b)âEntities that own, directly or indirectly, entities 1306 licensed or registered by the state pursuant to chapter 395; 1307 entities that own, directly or indirectly, entities licensed or 1308 registered by the state and providing only health care services 1309 within the scope of services authorized pursuant to their 1310 respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 390, 1311 chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, chapter 1312 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter 1313 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers 1314 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and 1315 providing only health care services within the scope of services 1316 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. 1317 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers 1318 certified and providing only health care services within the 1319 scope of services authorized under their respective 1320 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers 1321 certified and providing only health care services within the 1322 scope of services authorized under their respective 1323 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 1324 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 1325 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 1326 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 1327 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 1328 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 1329 licensed under chapter 395. 1330 3.(c)âEntities that are owned, directly or indirectly, by 1331 an entity licensed or registered by the state pursuant to 1332 chapter 395; entities that are owned, directly or indirectly, by 1333 an entity licensed or registered by the state and providing only 1334 health care services within the scope of services authorized 1335 pursuant to their respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, 1336 chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part 1337 X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 1338 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease 1339 providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers 1340 certified and providing only health care services within the 1341 scope of services authorized under their respective 1342 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H, 1343 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care 1344 services within the scope of services authorized under their 1345 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; 1346 providers certified and providing only health care services 1347 within the scope of services authorized under their respective 1348 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 1349 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 1350 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 1351 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 1352 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 1353 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 1354 under chapter 395. 1355 4.(d)âEntities that are under common ownership, directly or 1356 indirectly, with an entity licensed or registered by the state 1357 pursuant to chapter 395; entities that are under common 1358 ownership, directly or indirectly, with an entity licensed or 1359 registered by the state and providing only health care services 1360 within the scope of services authorized pursuant to their 1361 respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 390, 1362 chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, chapter 1363 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter 1364 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers 1365 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and 1366 providing only health care services within the scope of services 1367 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. 1368 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers 1369 certified and providing only health care services within the 1370 scope of services authorized under their respective 1371 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers 1372 certified and providing only health care services within the 1373 scope of services authorized under their respective 1374 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers 1375 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 1376 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 1377 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that 1378 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care 1379 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital 1380 licensed under chapter 395. 1381 5.(e)âAn entity that is exempt from federal taxation under 1382 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3) or (4), an employee stock ownership plan 1383 under 26 U.S.C. s. 409 that has a board of trustees at least 1384 two-thirds of which are Florida-licensed health care 1385 practitioners and provides only physical therapy services under 1386 physician orders, any community college or university clinic, 1387 and any entity owned or operated by the federal or state 1388 government, including agencies, subdivisions, or municipalities 1389 thereof. 1390 6.(f)âA sole proprietorship, group practice, partnership, 1391 or corporation that provides health care services by physicians 1392 covered by s. 627.419, that is directly supervised by one or 1393 more of such physicians, and that is wholly owned by one or more 1394 of those physicians or by a physician and the spouse, parent, 1395 child, or sibling of that physician. 1396 7.(g)âA sole proprietorship, group practice, partnership, 1397 or corporation that provides health care services by licensed 1398 health care practitioners under chapter 457, chapter 458, 1399 chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 462, chapter 463, 1400 chapter 466, chapter 467, chapter 480, chapter 484, chapter 486, 1401 chapter 490, chapter 491, or part I, part III, part X, part 1402 XIII, or part XIV of chapter 468, or s. 464.012, and that is 1403 wholly owned by one or more licensed health care practitioners, 1404 or the licensed health care practitioners set forth in this 1405 subparagraph paragraph and the spouse, parent, child, or sibling 1406 of a licensed health care practitioner if one of the owners who 1407 is a licensed health care practitioner is supervising the 1408 business activities and is legally responsible for the entityâs 1409 compliance with all federal and state laws. However, a health 1410 care practitioner may not supervise services beyond the scope of 1411 the practitionerâs license, except that, for the purposes of 1412 this part, a clinic owned by a licensee in s. 456.053(3)(b) 1413 which provides only services authorized pursuant to s. 1414 456.053(3)(b) may be supervised by a licensee specified in s. 1415 456.053(3)(b). 1416 8.(h)âClinical facilities affiliated with an accredited 1417 medical school at which training is provided for medical 1418 students, residents, or fellows. 1419 9.(i)âEntities that provide only oncology or radiation 1420 therapy services by physicians licensed under chapter 458 or 1421 chapter 459 or entities that provide oncology or radiation 1422 therapy services by physicians licensed under chapter 458 or 1423 chapter 459 which are owned by a corporation whose shares are 1424 publicly traded on a recognized stock exchange. 1425 10.(j)âClinical facilities affiliated with a college of 1426 chiropractic accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education 1427 at which training is provided for chiropractic students. 1428 11.(k)âEntities that provide licensed practitioners to 1429 staff emergency departments or to deliver anesthesia services in 1430 facilities licensed under chapter 395 and that derive at least 1431 90 percent of their gross annual revenues from the provision of 1432 such services. Entities claiming an exemption from licensure 1433 under this subparagraph paragraph must provide documentation 1434 demonstrating compliance. 1435 12.(l)âOrthotic, prosthetic, pediatric cardiology, or 1436 perinatology clinical facilities or anesthesia clinical 1437 facilities that are not otherwise exempt under subparagraph 1. 1438 or subparagraph 11. paragraph (a) or paragraph (k) and that are 1439 a publicly traded corporation or are wholly owned, directly or 1440 indirectly, by a publicly traded corporation. As used in this 1441 subparagraph paragraph, a publicly traded corporation is a 1442 corporation that issues securities traded on an exchange 1443 registered with the United States Securities and Exchange 1444 Commission as a national securities exchange. 1445 13.(m)âEntities that are owned by a corporation that has 1446 $250 million or more in total annual sales of health care 1447 services provided by licensed health care practitioners where 1448 one or more of the persons responsible for the operations of the 1449 entity is a health care practitioner who is licensed in this 1450 state and who is responsible for supervising the business 1451 activities of the entity and is responsible for the entityâs 1452 compliance with state law for purposes of this part. 1453 14.(n)âEntities that employ 50 or more licensed health care 1454 practitioners licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 where 1455 the billing for medical services is under a single tax 1456 identification number. The application for exemption under this 1457 subparagraph must include subsection shall contain information 1458 that includes: the name, residence, and business address and 1459 telephone phone number of the entity that owns the practice; a 1460 complete list of the names and contact information of all the 1461 officers and directors of the corporation; the name, residence 1462 address, business address, and medical license number of each 1463 licensed Florida health care practitioner employed by the 1464 entity; the corporate tax identification number of the entity 1465 seeking an exemption; a listing of health care services to be 1466 provided by the entity at the health care clinics owned or 1467 operated by the entity; and a certified statement prepared by an 1468 independent certified public accountant which states that the 1469 entity and the health care clinics owned or operated by the 1470 entity have not received payment for health care services under 1471 medical payments personal injury protection insurance coverage 1472 for the preceding year. If the agency determines that an entity 1473 that which is exempt under this subparagraph subsection has 1474 received payments for medical services under medical payments 1475 personal injury protection insurance coverage, the agency may 1476 deny or revoke the exemption from licensure under this 1477 subparagraph subsection. 1478 15.(o)âEntities that are, directly or indirectly, under the 1479 common ownership of or that are subject to common control by a 1480 mutual insurance holding company, as defined in s. 628.703, with 1481 an entity issued a certificate of authority under chapter 624 or 1482 chapter 641 which has $1 billion or more in total annual sales 1483 in this state. 1484 16.(p)âEntities that are owned by an entity that is a 1485 behavioral health care service provider in at least five other 1486 states; that, together with its affiliates, have $90 million or 1487 more in total annual revenues associated with the provision of 1488 behavioral health care services; and wherein one or more of the 1489 persons responsible for the operations of the entity is a health 1490 care practitioner who is licensed in this state, who is 1491 responsible for supervising the business activities of the 1492 entity, and who is responsible for the entityâs compliance with 1493 state law for purposes of this part. 1494 17.(q)âMedicaid providers. 1495 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a) this subsection, an 1496 entity is shall be deemed a clinic and must be licensed under 1497 this part in order to receive medical payments coverage 1498 reimbursement unless the entity is: 1499 1.âWholly owned by a physician licensed under chapter 458 1500 or chapter 459 or by the physician and the spouse, parent, 1501 child, or sibling of the physician; 1502 2.âWholly owned by a dentist licensed under chapter 466 or 1503 by the dentist and the spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the 1504 dentist; 1505 3.âWholly owned by a chiropractic physician licensed under 1506 chapter 460 or by the chiropractic physician and the spouse, 1507 parent, child, or sibling of the chiropractic physician; 1508 4.âA hospital or an ambulatory surgical center licensed 1509 under chapter 395; 1510 5.âAn entity that wholly owns or is wholly owned, directly 1511 or indirectly, by a hospital licensed under chapter 395; 1512 6.âA clinical facility affiliated with an accredited 1513 medical school at which training is provided for medical 1514 students, residents, or fellows; 1515 7.âCertified under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart H; or 1516 8.âOwned by a publicly traded corporation, either directly 1517 or indirectly through its subsidiaries, which has $250 million 1518 or more in total annual sales of health care services provided 1519 by licensed health care practitioners, if one or more of the 1520 persons responsible for the operations of the entity are health 1521 care practitioners who are licensed in this state and who are 1522 responsible for supervising the business activities of the 1523 entity and the entityâs compliance with state law for purposes 1524 of this subsection under the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law, 1525 ss. 627.730-627.7405, unless exempted under s. 627.736(5)(h). 1526 Section 29.âSubsection (5) of section 400.991, Florida 1527 Statutes, is amended to read: 1528 400.991âLicense requirements; background screenings; 1529 prohibitions.â 1530 (5)âAll agency forms for licensure application or exemption 1531 from licensure under this part must contain the following 1532 statement: 1533 1534 INSURANCE FRAUD NOTICE.âA person commits a fraudulent 1535 insurance act, as defined in s. 626.989, Florida 1536 Statutes, if the person who knowingly submits a false, 1537 misleading, or fraudulent application or other 1538 document when applying for licensure as a health care 1539 clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a 1540 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with 1541 part X of chapter 400, Florida Statutes, with the 1542 intent to use the license, exemption from licensure, 1543 or demonstration of compliance to provide services or 1544 seek reimbursement under a motor vehicle liability 1545 policyâs medical payments coverage the Florida Motor 1546 Vehicle No-Fault Law, commits a fraudulent insurance 1547 act, as defined in s. 626.989, Florida Statutes. A 1548 person who presents a claim for benefits under medical 1549 payments coverage personal injury protection benefits 1550 knowing that the payee knowingly submitted such health 1551 care clinic application or document commits insurance 1552 fraud, as defined in s. 817.234, Florida Statutes. 1553 Section 30.âParagraph (g) of subsection (1) of section 1554 400.9935, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1555 400.9935âClinic responsibilities.â 1556 (1)âEach clinic shall appoint a medical director or clinic 1557 director who shall agree in writing to accept legal 1558 responsibility for the following activities on behalf of the 1559 clinic. The medical director or the clinic director shall: 1560 (g)âConduct systematic reviews of clinic billings to ensure 1561 that the billings are not fraudulent or unlawful. Upon discovery 1562 of an unlawful charge, the medical director or clinic director 1563 shall take immediate corrective action. If the clinic performs 1564 only the technical component of magnetic resonance imaging, 1565 static radiographs, computed tomography, or positron emission 1566 tomography, and provides the professional interpretation of such 1567 services, in a fixed facility that is accredited by a national 1568 accrediting organization that is approved by the Centers for 1569 Medicare and Medicaid Services for magnetic resonance imaging 1570 and advanced diagnostic imaging services and if, in the 1571 preceding quarter, the percentage of scans performed by that 1572 clinic which was billed to motor vehicle all personal injury 1573 protection insurance carriers under medical payments coverage 1574 was less than 15 percent, the chief financial officer of the 1575 clinic may, in a written acknowledgment provided to the agency, 1576 assume the responsibility for the conduct of the systematic 1577 reviews of clinic billings to ensure that the billings are not 1578 fraudulent or unlawful. 1579 Section 31.âSubsection (28) of section 409.901, Florida 1580 Statutes, is amended to read: 1581 409.901âDefinitions; ss. 409.901-409.920.âAs used in ss. 1582 409.901-409.920, except as otherwise specifically provided, the 1583 term: 1584 (28)ââThird-party benefitâ means any benefit that is or may 1585 be available at any time through contract, court award, 1586 judgment, settlement, agreement, or any arrangement between a 1587 third party and any person or entity, including, without 1588 limitation, a Medicaid recipient, a provider, another third 1589 party, an insurer, or the agency, for any Medicaid-covered 1590 injury, illness, goods, or services, including costs of medical 1591 services related thereto, for bodily personal injury or for 1592 death of the recipient, but specifically excluding policies of 1593 life insurance policies on the recipient, unless available under 1594 terms of the policy to pay medical expenses before prior to 1595 death. The term includes, without limitation, collateral, as 1596 defined in this section;, health insurance;, any benefit under a 1597 health maintenance organization, a preferred provider 1598 arrangement, a prepaid health clinic, liability insurance, 1599 uninsured motorist insurance, or medical payments coverage; or 1600 personal injury protection coverage, medical benefits under 1601 workersâ compensation;, and any obligation under law or equity 1602 to provide medical support. 1603 Section 32.âParagraph (f) of subsection (11) of section 1604 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1605 409.910âResponsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid 1606 eligible persons when other parties are liable.â 1607 (11)âThe agency may, as a matter of right, in order to 1608 enforce its rights under this section, institute, intervene in, 1609 or join any legal or administrative proceeding in its own name 1610 in one or more of the following capacities: individually, as 1611 subrogee of the recipient, as assignee of the recipient, or as 1612 lienholder of the collateral. 1613 (f)âNotwithstanding any provision in this section to the 1614 contrary, in the event of an action in tort against a third 1615 party in which the recipient or his or her legal representative 1616 is a party which results in a judgment, award, or settlement 1617 from a third party, the amount recovered shall be distributed as 1618 follows: 1619 1.âAfter attorney attorneyâs fees and taxable costs as 1620 defined by the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, one-half of the 1621 remaining recovery shall be paid to the agency up to the total 1622 amount of medical assistance provided by Medicaid. 1623 2.âThe remaining amount of the recovery shall be paid to 1624 the recipient. 1625 3.âFor purposes of calculating the agencyâs recovery of 1626 medical assistance benefits paid, the fee for services of an 1627 attorney retained by the recipient or his or her legal 1628 representative shall be calculated at 25 percent of the 1629 judgment, award, or settlement. 1630 4.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section to 1631 the contrary, the agency is shall be entitled to all medical 1632 coverage benefits up to the total amount of medical assistance 1633 provided by Medicaid. For purposes of this paragraph, the term 1634 âmedical coverageâ means any benefits under health insurance, a 1635 health maintenance organization, a preferred provider 1636 arrangement, or a prepaid health clinic, and the portion of 1637 benefits designated for medical payments under coverage for 1638 workersâ compensation coverage, motor vehicle insurance 1639 coverage, personal injury protection, and casualty coverage. 1640 Section 33.âParagraph (k) of subsection (2) of section 1641 456.057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1642 456.057âOwnership and control of patient records; report or 1643 copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of information.â 1644 (2)âAs used in this section, the terms ârecords owner,â 1645 âhealth care practitioner,â and âhealth care practitionerâs 1646 employerâ do not include any of the following persons or 1647 entities; furthermore, the following persons or entities are not 1648 authorized to acquire or own medical records, but are authorized 1649 under the confidentiality and disclosure requirements of this 1650 section to maintain those documents required by the part or 1651 chapter under which they are licensed or regulated: 1652 (k)âPersons or entities practicing under s. 627.736(7). 1653 Section 34.âParagraphs (ee) and (ff) of subsection (1) of 1654 section 456.072, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1655 456.072âGrounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.â 1656 (1)âThe following acts shall constitute grounds for which 1657 the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be 1658 taken: 1659 (ee)âWith respect to making a medical payments coverage 1660 personal injury protection claim as required by s. 627.736, 1661 intentionally submitting a claim, statement, or bill that has 1662 been upcoded. As used in this paragraph, the term âupcodeâ means 1663 to submit a billing code that would result in a greater payment 1664 amount than would be paid using a billing code that accurately 1665 describes the services performed. The term does not include an 1666 otherwise lawful bill by a magnetic resonance imaging facility 1667 which globally combines both technical and professional 1668 components, if the amount of the global bill is not more than 1669 the components if billed separately; however, payment of such a 1670 bill constitutes payment in full for all components of such 1671 service âupcodedâ as defined in s. 627.732. 1672 (ff)âWith respect to making a medical payments coverage 1673 personal injury protection claim as required by s. 627.736, 1674 intentionally submitting a claim, statement, or bill for payment 1675 of services that were not rendered. 1676 Section 35.âParagraphs (i) and (o) of subsection (1) of 1677 section 626.9541, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1678 626.9541âUnfair methods of competition and unfair or 1679 deceptive acts or practices defined.â 1680 (1)âUNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE 1681 ACTS.âThe following are defined as unfair methods of competition 1682 and unfair or deceptive acts or practices: 1683 (i)âUnfair claim settlement practices.â 1684 1.âAttempting to settle claims on the basis of an 1685 application, when serving as a binder or intended to become a 1686 part of the policy, or any other material document which was 1687 altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the 1688 insured; 1689 2.âMaking a material misrepresentation made to an insured 1690 or any other person having an interest in the proceeds payable 1691 under such contract or policy, for the purpose and with the 1692 intent of effecting settlement of such claims, loss, or damage 1693 under such contract or policy on less favorable terms than those 1694 provided in, and contemplated by, such contract or policy; 1695 3.âCommitting or performing with such frequency as to 1696 indicate a general business practice any of the following: 1697 a.âFailing to adopt and implement standards for the proper 1698 investigation of claims; 1699 b.âMisrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy 1700 provisions relating to coverages at issue; 1701 c.âFailing to acknowledge and act promptly upon 1702 communications with respect to claims; 1703 d.âDenying claims without conducting reasonable 1704 investigations based upon available information; 1705 e.âFailing to affirm or deny full or partial coverage of 1706 claims, and, as to partial coverage, the dollar amount or extent 1707 of coverage, or failing to provide a written statement that the 1708 claim is being investigated, upon the written request of the 1709 insured within 30 days after proof-of-loss statements have been 1710 completed; 1711 f.âFailing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation in 1712 writing to the insured of the basis in the insurance policy, in 1713 relation to the facts or applicable law, for denial of a claim 1714 or for the offer of a compromise settlement; 1715 g.âFailing to promptly notify the insured of any additional 1716 information necessary for the processing of a claim; 1717 h.âFailing to clearly explain the nature of the requested 1718 information and the reasons why such information is necessary; 1719 or 1720 i.âFailing to pay personal injury protection insurance 1721 claims within the time periods required by s. 627.736(4)(b). The 1722 office may order the insurer to pay restitution to a 1723 policyholder, medical provider, or other claimant, including 1724 interest at a rate consistent with the amount set forth in s. 1725 55.03(1), for the time period within which an insurer fails to 1726 pay claims as required by law. Restitution is in addition to any 1727 other penalties allowed by law, including, but not limited to, 1728 the suspension of the insurerâs certificate of authority; or 1729 j.âAltering or amending an insurance adjusterâs report 1730 without: 1731 (I)âProviding a detailed explanation as to why any change 1732 that has the effect of reducing the estimate of the loss was 1733 made; and 1734 (II)âIncluding on the report or as an addendum to the 1735 report a detailed list of all changes made to the report and the 1736 identity of the person who ordered each change; or 1737 (III)âRetaining all versions of the report, and including 1738 within each such version, for each change made within such 1739 version of the report, the identity of each person who made or 1740 ordered such change; or 1741 4.âFailing to pay undisputed amounts of partial or full 1742 benefits owed under first-party property insurance policies 1743 within 60 days after an insurer receives notice of a residential 1744 property insurance claim, determines the amounts of partial or 1745 full benefits, and agrees to coverage, unless payment of the 1746 undisputed benefits is prevented by factors beyond the control 1747 of the insurer as defined in s. 627.70131(5). 1748 (o)âIllegal dealings in premiums; excess or reduced charges 1749 for insurance.â 1750 1.âKnowingly collecting any sum as a premium or charge for 1751 insurance, which is not then provided, or is not in due course 1752 to be provided, subject to acceptance of the risk by the 1753 insurer, by an insurance policy issued by an insurer as 1754 permitted by this code. 1755 2.âKnowingly collecting as a premium or charge for 1756 insurance any sum in excess of or less than the premium or 1757 charge applicable to such insurance, in accordance with the 1758 applicable classifications and rates as filed with and approved 1759 by the office, and as specified in the policy; or, in cases when 1760 classifications, premiums, or rates are not required by this 1761 code to be so filed and approved, premiums and charges collected 1762 from a Florida resident in excess of or less than those 1763 specified in the policy and as fixed by the insurer. 1764 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this provision may 1765 shall not be deemed to prohibit the charging and collection, by 1766 surplus lines agents licensed under part VIII of this chapter, 1767 of the amount of applicable state and federal taxes, or fees as 1768 authorized by s. 626.916(2), in addition to the premium required 1769 by the insurer or the charging and collection, by licensed 1770 agents, of the exact amount of any discount or other such fee 1771 charged by a credit card facility in connection with the use of 1772 a credit card, as authorized by subparagraph (q)3., in addition 1773 to the premium required by the insurer. This subparagraph may 1774 shall not be construed to prohibit collection of a premium for a 1775 universal life or a variable or indeterminate value insurance 1776 policy made in accordance with the terms of the contract. 1777 3.a.âImposing or requesting an additional premium for 1778 bodily injury liability coverage, property damage liability 1779 coverage a policy of motor vehicle liability, personal injury 1780 protection, medical payments coverage payment, or collision 1781 coverage in a motor vehicle liability policy insurance or any 1782 combination thereof or refusing to renew the policy solely 1783 because the insured was involved in a motor vehicle accident 1784 unless the insurerâs file contains information from which the 1785 insurer in good faith determines that the insured was 1786 substantially at fault in the accident. 1787 b.âAn insurer which imposes and collects such a surcharge 1788 or which refuses to renew such policy shall, in conjunction with 1789 the notice of premium due or notice of nonrenewal, notify the 1790 named insured that he or she is entitled to reimbursement of 1791 such amount or renewal of the policy under the conditions listed 1792 below and will subsequently reimburse him or her or renew the 1793 policy, if the named insured demonstrates that the operator 1794 involved in the accident was: 1795 (I)âLawfully parked; 1796 (II)âReimbursed by, or on behalf of, a person responsible 1797 for the accident or has a judgment against such person; 1798 (III)âStruck in the rear by another vehicle headed in the 1799 same direction and was not convicted of a moving traffic 1800 violation in connection with the accident; 1801 (IV)âHit by a âhit-and-runâ driver, if the accident was 1802 reported to the proper authorities within 24 hours after 1803 discovering the accident; 1804 (V)âNot convicted of a moving traffic violation in 1805 connection with the accident, but the operator of the other 1806 automobile involved in such accident was convicted of a moving 1807 traffic violation; 1808 (VI)âFinally adjudicated not to be liable by a court of 1809 competent jurisdiction; 1810 (VII)âIn receipt of a traffic citation which was dismissed 1811 or nolle prossed; or 1812 (VIII)âNot at fault as evidenced by a written statement 1813 from the insured establishing facts demonstrating lack of fault 1814 which are not rebutted by information in the insurerâs file from 1815 which the insurer in good faith determines that the insured was 1816 substantially at fault. 1817 c.âIn addition to the other provisions of this 1818 subparagraph, an insurer may not fail to renew a policy if the 1819 insured has had only one accident in which he or she was at 1820 fault within the current 3-year period. However, an insurer may 1821 nonrenew a policy for reasons other than accidents in accordance 1822 with s. 627.728. This subparagraph does not prohibit nonrenewal 1823 of a policy under which the insured has had three or more 1824 accidents, regardless of fault, during the most recent 3-year 1825 period. 1826 4.âImposing or requesting an additional premium for, or 1827 refusing to renew, a policy for motor vehicle insurance solely 1828 because the insured committed a noncriminal traffic infraction 1829 as described in s. 318.14 unless the infraction is: 1830 a.âA second infraction committed within an 18-month period, 1831 or a third or subsequent infraction committed within a 36-month 1832 period. 1833 b.âA violation of s. 316.183, when such violation is a 1834 result of exceeding the lawful speed limit by more than 15 miles 1835 per hour. 1836 5.âUpon the request of the insured, the insurer and 1837 licensed agent shall supply to the insured the complete proof of 1838 fault or other criteria which justifies the additional charge or 1839 cancellation. 1840 6.âNo insurer shall impose or request an additional premium 1841 for motor vehicle insurance, cancel or refuse to issue a policy, 1842 or refuse to renew a policy because the insured or the applicant 1843 is a handicapped or physically disabled person, so long as such 1844 handicap or physical disability does not substantially impair 1845 such personâs mechanically assisted driving ability. 1846 7.âNo insurer may cancel or otherwise terminate any 1847 insurance contract or coverage, or require execution of a 1848 consent to rate endorsement, during the stated policy term for 1849 the purpose of offering to issue, or issuing, a similar or 1850 identical contract or coverage to the same insured with the same 1851 exposure at a higher premium rate or continuing an existing 1852 contract or coverage with the same exposure at an increased 1853 premium. 1854 8.âNo insurer may issue a nonrenewal notice on any 1855 insurance contract or coverage, or require execution of a 1856 consent to rate endorsement, for the purpose of offering to 1857 issue, or issuing, a similar or identical contract or coverage 1858 to the same insured at a higher premium rate or continuing an 1859 existing contract or coverage at an increased premium without 1860 meeting any applicable notice requirements. 1861 9.âNo insurer shall, with respect to premiums charged for 1862 motor vehicle insurance, unfairly discriminate solely on the 1863 basis of age, sex, marital status, or scholastic achievement. 1864 10.âImposing or requesting an additional premium for motor 1865 vehicle comprehensive or uninsured motorist coverage solely 1866 because the insured was involved in a motor vehicle accident or 1867 was convicted of a moving traffic violation. 1868 11.âNo insurer shall cancel or issue a nonrenewal notice on 1869 any insurance policy or contract without complying with any 1870 applicable cancellation or nonrenewal provision required under 1871 the Florida Insurance Code. 1872 12.âNo insurer shall impose or request an additional 1873 premium, cancel a policy, or issue a nonrenewal notice on any 1874 insurance policy or contract because of any traffic infraction 1875 when adjudication has been withheld and no points have been 1876 assessed pursuant to s. 318.14(9) and (10). However, this 1877 subparagraph does not apply to traffic infractions involving 1878 accidents in which the insurer has incurred a loss due to the 1879 fault of the insured. 1880 Section 36.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1881 626.989, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1882 626.989âInvestigation by department or Division of Criminal 1883 Investigations; compliance; immunity; confidential information; 1884 reports to division; division investigatorâs power of arrest.â 1885 (1)âFor the purposes of this section: 1886 (a)âA person commits a âfraudulent insurance actâ if the 1887 person: 1888 1.âKnowingly and with intent to defraud presents, causes to 1889 be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it will 1890 be presented, to or by an insurer, self-insurer, self-insurance 1891 fund, servicing corporation, purported insurer, broker, or any 1892 agent thereof, any written statement as part of, or in support 1893 of, an application for the issuance of, or the rating of, any 1894 insurance policy, or a claim for payment or other benefit 1895 pursuant to any insurance policy, which the person knows to 1896 contain materially false information concerning any fact 1897 material thereto or if the person conceals, for the purpose of 1898 misleading another, information concerning any fact material 1899 thereto. 1900 2.âKnowingly submits: 1901 a.âA false, misleading, or fraudulent application or other 1902 document when applying for licensure as a health care clinic, 1903 seeking an exemption from licensure as a health care clinic, or 1904 demonstrating compliance with part X of chapter 400 with an 1905 intent to use the license, exemption from licensure, or 1906 demonstration of compliance to provide services or seek 1907 reimbursement under a motor vehicle liability policyâs medical 1908 payments coverage the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law. 1909 b.âA claim for payment or other benefit under a motor 1910 vehicle liability policyâs medical payments coverage, pursuant 1911 to a personal injury protection insurance policy under the 1912 Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law if the person knows that the 1913 payee knowingly submitted a false, misleading, or fraudulent 1914 application or other document when applying for licensure as a 1915 health care clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a 1916 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with part X of 1917 chapter 400. 1918 Section 37.âSubsection (1) of section 627.06501, Florida 1919 Statutes, is amended to read: 1920 627.06501âInsurance discounts for certain persons 1921 completing driver improvement course.â 1922 (1)âAny rate, rating schedule, or rating manual for the 1923 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and 1924 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed 1925 with the office may provide for an appropriate reduction in 1926 premium charges as to such coverages if when the principal 1927 operator on the covered vehicle has successfully completed a 1928 driver improvement course approved and certified by the 1929 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles which is 1930 effective in reducing crash or violation rates, or both, as 1931 determined pursuant to s. 318.1451(5). Any discount, not to 1932 exceed 10 percent, used by an insurer is presumed to be 1933 appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise. 1934 Section 38.âSubsection (15) is added to section 627.0651, 1935 Florida Statutes, to read: 1936 627.0651âMaking and use of rates for motor vehicle 1937 insurance.â 1938 (15)âRate filings for motor vehicle liability policies that 1939 implement the financial responsibility requirements of s. 1940 324.022 in effect January 1, 2027, except for commercial motor 1941 vehicle insurance policies exempt under paragraph (14)(a), must 1942 reflect such financial responsibility requirements and may be 1943 approved only through the file and use process in accordance 1944 with paragraph (1)(a). 1945 Section 39.âSubsection (1) of section 627.0652, Florida 1946 Statutes, is amended to read: 1947 627.0652âInsurance discounts for certain persons completing 1948 safety course.â 1949 (1)âAny rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for the 1950 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and 1951 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed 1952 with the office must shall provide for an appropriate reduction 1953 in premium charges as to such coverages if when the principal 1954 operator on the covered vehicle is an insured 55 years of age or 1955 older who has successfully completed a motor vehicle accident 1956 prevention course approved by the Department of Highway Safety 1957 and Motor Vehicles. Any discount used by an insurer is presumed 1958 to be appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise. 1959 Section 40.âSubsections (1), (3), and (6) of section 1960 627.0653, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1961 627.0653âInsurance discounts for specified motor vehicle 1962 equipment.â 1963 (1)âAny rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for the 1964 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and 1965 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed 1966 with the office must shall provide a premium discount if the 1967 insured vehicle is equipped with factory-installed, four-wheel 1968 antilock brakes. 1969 (3)âAny rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for 1970 personal injury protection coverage and medical payments 1971 coverage, if offered, of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed 1972 with the office must shall provide a premium discount if the 1973 insured vehicle is equipped with one or more air bags that which 1974 are factory installed. 1975 (6)âThe Office of Insurance Regulation may approve a 1976 premium discount to any rates, rating schedules, or rating 1977 manuals for the liability, medical payments personal injury 1978 protection, and collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance 1979 policy filed with the office if the insured vehicle is equipped 1980 with an automated driving system or electronic vehicle collision 1981 avoidance technology that is factory installed or a retrofitted 1982 system and that complies with National Highway Traffic Safety 1983 Administration standards. 1984 Section 41.âSection 627.4132, Florida Statutes, is amended 1985 to read: 1986 627.4132âStacking of coverages prohibited.âIf an insured or 1987 named insured is protected by any type of motor vehicle 1988 insurance policy providing primary bodily injury and property 1989 damage for liability, personal injury protection, or other 1990 coverage, the policy must shall provide that the insured or 1991 named insured is protected only to the extent of the coverage 1992 she or he has on the vehicle involved in the accident. However, 1993 if none of the insuredâs or named insuredâs vehicles are is 1994 involved in the accident, coverage is available only to the 1995 extent of coverage on any one of the vehicles with applicable 1996 coverage. Coverage on any other vehicles may shall not be added 1997 to or stacked upon that coverage. This section does not apply: 1998 (1)âApply to uninsured motorist coverage that which is 1999 separately governed by s. 627.727. 2000 (2)âTo Reduce the coverage available by reason of insurance 2001 policies insuring different named insureds. 2002 Section 42.âSubsection (1) of section 627.4137, Florida 2003 Statutes, is amended to read: 2004 627.4137âDisclosure of certain information required.â 2005 (1)âEach insurer that provides which does or may provide 2006 liability insurance coverage to pay all or a portion of any 2007 claim which might be made shall provide, within 30 days after of 2008 the written request of the claimant or the claimantâs attorney, 2009 a statement, under oath, of a corporate officer or the insurerâs 2010 claims manager or superintendent setting forth the following 2011 information with regard to each known policy of insurance, 2012 including excess or umbrella insurance: 2013 (a)âThe name of the insurer. 2014 (b)âThe name of each insured. 2015 (c)âThe limits of the liability coverage. 2016 (d)âA statement of any policy or coverage defense which 2017 such insurer reasonably believes is available to such insurer at 2018 the time of filing such statement. 2019 (e)âA copy of the policy. 2020 2021 In addition, the insured, or her or his insurance agent, upon 2022 written request of the claimant or the claimantâs attorney, 2023 shall disclose the name and coverage of each known insurer to 2024 the claimant and shall forward such request for information as 2025 required by this subsection to all affected insurers. The 2026 insurer shall then supply the information required in this 2027 subsection to the claimant within 30 days after of receipt of 2028 such request. If an insurer fails to timely comply with this 2029 subsection, the claimant may file an action in a court of 2030 competent jurisdiction to enforce this section. If the court 2031 determines that the insurer violated this subsection, the 2032 claimant is entitled to an award of reasonable attorney fees and 2033 costs, payable by the insurer. 2034 Section 43.âSection 627.7263, Florida Statutes, is amended 2035 to read: 2036 627.7263âRental and leasing driverâs insurance to be 2037 primary; exception.â 2038 (1)âThe valid and collectible liability insurance or 2039 personal injury protection insurance providing coverage for the 2040 lessor of a motor vehicle for rent or lease is primary unless 2041 otherwise stated in at least 10-point type on the face of the 2042 rental or lease agreement. Such insurance is primary for the 2043 limits of liability and personal injury protection coverage as 2044 required under s. 324.021(7) by ss. 324.021(7) and 627.736. 2045 (2)âIf the lesseeâs coverage is to be primary, the rental 2046 or lease agreement must contain the following language, in at 2047 least 10-point type: 2048 2049 âThe valid and collectible liability insurance and 2050 personal injury protection insurance of an any 2051 authorized rental or leasing driver is primary for the 2052 limits of liability and personal injury protection 2053 coverage required under s. 324.021(7) by ss. 2054 324.021(7) and 627.736, Florida Statutes.â 2055 Section 44.âSubsections (1) and (7) of section 627.727, 2056 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2057 627.727âMotor vehicle insurance; uninsured and underinsured 2058 vehicle coverage; insolvent insurer protection.â 2059 (1)âA No motor vehicle liability insurance policy that 2060 which provides bodily injury liability coverage may not shall be 2061 delivered or issued for delivery in this state with respect to 2062 any specifically insured or identified motor vehicle registered 2063 or principally garaged in this state unless uninsured motor 2064 vehicle coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for 2065 the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally 2066 entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of 2067 uninsured motor vehicles because of bodily injury, sickness, or 2068 disease, including death, resulting therefrom. However, the 2069 coverage required under this section is not applicable if when, 2070 or to the extent that, an insured named in the policy makes a 2071 written rejection of the coverage on behalf of all insureds 2072 under the policy. If When a motor vehicle is leased for a period 2073 of 1 year or longer and the lessor of such vehicle, by the terms 2074 of the lease contract, provides liability coverage on the leased 2075 vehicle, the lessee of such vehicle has shall have the sole 2076 privilege to reject uninsured motorist coverage or to select 2077 lower limits than the bodily injury liability limits, regardless 2078 of whether the lessor is qualified as a self-insurer pursuant to 2079 s. 324.171. Unless an insured, or a lessee having the privilege 2080 of rejecting uninsured motorist coverage, requests such coverage 2081 or requests higher uninsured motorist limits in writing, the 2082 coverage or such higher uninsured motorist limits need not be 2083 provided in or supplemental to any other policy that which 2084 renews, extends, changes, supersedes, or replaces an existing 2085 policy with the same bodily injury liability limits when an 2086 insured or lessee had rejected the coverage. When an insured or 2087 lessee has initially selected limits of uninsured motorist 2088 coverage lower than her or his bodily injury liability limits, 2089 higher limits of uninsured motorist coverage need not be 2090 provided in or supplemental to any other policy that which 2091 renews, extends, changes, supersedes, or replaces an existing 2092 policy with the same bodily injury liability limits unless an 2093 insured requests higher uninsured motorist coverage in writing. 2094 The rejection or selection of lower limits must shall be made on 2095 a form approved by the office. The form must shall fully advise 2096 the applicant of the nature of the coverage and must shall state 2097 that the coverage is equal to bodily injury liability limits 2098 unless lower limits are requested or the coverage is rejected. 2099 The heading of the form must shall be in 12-point bold type and 2100 must shall state: âYou are electing not to purchase certain 2101 valuable coverage that which protects you and your family or you 2102 are purchasing uninsured motorist limits less than your bodily 2103 injury liability limits when you sign this form. Please read 2104 carefully.â If this form is signed by a named insured, it will 2105 be conclusively presumed that there was an informed, knowing 2106 rejection of coverage or election of lower limits on behalf of 2107 all insureds. The insurer shall notify the named insured at 2108 least annually of her or his options as to the coverage required 2109 by this section. Such notice must shall be part of, and attached 2110 to, the notice of premium, must shall provide for a means to 2111 allow the insured to request such coverage, and must shall be 2112 given in a manner approved by the office. Receipt of this notice 2113 does not constitute an affirmative waiver of the insuredâs right 2114 to uninsured motorist coverage if where the insured has not 2115 signed a selection or rejection form. The coverage described 2116 under this section must shall be over and above, but may shall 2117 not duplicate, the benefits available to an insured under any 2118 workersâ compensation law, personal injury protection benefits, 2119 disability benefits law, or similar law; under any automobile 2120 medical payments expense coverage; under any motor vehicle 2121 liability insurance coverage; or from the owner or operator of 2122 the uninsured motor vehicle or any other person or organization 2123 jointly or severally liable together with such owner or operator 2124 for the accident,; and such coverage must shall cover any the 2125 difference, if any, between the sum of such benefits and the 2126 damages sustained, up to the maximum amount of such coverage 2127 provided under this section. The amount of coverage available 2128 under this section may shall not be reduced by a setoff against 2129 any coverage, including liability insurance. Such coverage does 2130 shall not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any 2131 workersâ compensation or disability benefits carrier or any 2132 person or organization qualifying as a self-insurer under any 2133 workersâ compensation or disability benefits law or similar law. 2134 (7)âThe legal liability of an uninsured motorist coverage 2135 insurer includes does not include damages in tort for pain, 2136 suffering, disability, physical impairment, disfigurement, 2137 mental anguish, and inconvenience, and the loss of capacity for 2138 the enjoyment of life experienced in the past and to be 2139 experienced in the future unless the injury or disease is 2140 described in one or more of paragraphs (a)-(d) of s. 627.737(2). 2141 Section 45.âSection 627.7275, Florida Statutes, is amended 2142 to read: 2143 627.7275âRequired coverages in motor vehicle insurance 2144 policies; availability to certain applicants liability.â 2145 (1)âA motor vehicle insurance policy providing personal 2146 injury protection as set forth in s. 627.736 may not be 2147 delivered or issued for delivery in this state for a with 2148 respect to any specifically insured or identified motor vehicle 2149 registered or principally garaged in this state must provide 2150 bodily injury liability coverage and unless the policy also 2151 provides coverage for property damage liability coverage as 2152 required under ss. 324.022 and 324.151 by s. 324.022. 2153 (2)(a)âInsurers writing motor vehicle insurance in this 2154 state shall make available, subject to the insurersâ usual 2155 underwriting restrictions: 2156 1.âCoverage under policies as described in subsection (1) 2157 to an applicant for private passenger motor vehicle insurance 2158 coverage who is seeking the coverage in order to reinstate the 2159 applicantâs driving privileges in this state if the driving 2160 privileges were revoked or suspended pursuant to s. 316.646 or 2161 s. 324.0221 due to the failure of the applicant to maintain 2162 required security. 2163 2.âCoverage under policies as described in subsection (1), 2164 which includes bodily injury also provides liability coverage 2165 and property damage liability coverage for bodily injury, death, 2166 and property damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance, 2167 or use of the motor vehicle in an amount not less than the 2168 minimum limits required under described in s. 324.021(7) or s. 2169 324.023 and which conforms to the requirements of s. 324.151, to 2170 an applicant for private passenger motor vehicle insurance 2171 coverage who is seeking the coverage in order to reinstate the 2172 applicantâs driving privileges in this state after such 2173 privileges were revoked or suspended under s. 316.193 or s. 2174 322.26(2) for driving under the influence. 2175 (b)âThe policies described in paragraph (a) must shall be 2176 issued for at least 6 months. After the insurer has issued the 2177 policy, the insurer shall notify the Department of Highway 2178 Safety and Motor Vehicles that the policy is in full force and 2179 effect. Once the provisions of the policy become effective, the 2180 bodily injury liability and property damage liability coverages 2181 for bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury 2182 protection may not be reduced below the minimum limits required 2183 under s. 324.021 or s. 324.023 during the policy period. 2184 (c)âThis subsection controls to the extent of any conflict 2185 with any other section. 2186 (d)âAn insurer issuing a policy subject to this section may 2187 cancel the policy if, during the policy term, the named insured, 2188 or any other operator who resides in the same household or 2189 customarily operates an automobile insured under the policy, has 2190 his or her driver license suspended or revoked. 2191 (e)âThis subsection does not require an insurer to offer a 2192 policy of insurance to an applicant if such offer would be 2193 inconsistent with the insurerâs underwriting guidelines and 2194 procedures. 2195 Section 46.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, section 2196 627.7278, Florida Statutes, is created to read: 2197 627.7278âApplicability and construction; notice to 2198 policyholders.â 2199 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âminimum security 2200 requirementsâ means security in the amounts required by s. 2201 324.022 which enables a person to respond in damages for 2202 liability on account of crashes arising out of the ownership, 2203 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle. 2204 (2)âEffective January 1, 2027: 2205 (a)âMotor vehicle insurance policies issued or renewed on 2206 or after January 1, 2027, may not include personal injury 2207 protection. 2208 (b)âAll persons subject to s. 324.022, s. 324.032, s. 2209 627.7415, or s. 627.742 must meet at least the minimum security 2210 requirements and maintain the required amount of coverage. 2211 (c)âA motor vehicle insurance policy issued before January 2212 1, 2027, which provides personal injury protection and property 2213 damage liability coverage that meets the requirements of s. 2214 324.022 on December 31, 2026, but that does not meet minimum 2215 security requirements in effect on or after January 1, 2027, is 2216 deemed to meet minimum security requirements until such policy 2217 is renewed, nonrenewed, or canceled on or after January 1, 2027. 2218 Sections 400.9905, 400.991, 456.057, 456.072, 626.9541(1)(i), 2219 627.7263, 627.727, 627.730-627.7405, 627.748, and 817.234, 2220 Florida Statutes 2025, remain in full force and effect for motor 2221 vehicle accidents covered under a policy issued under the 2222 Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law before January 1, 2027, until 2223 the policy is renewed, nonrenewed, or canceled on or after 2224 January 1, 2027. 2225 (3)âAn insurer shall allow each insured who has a new or 2226 renewal policy providing personal injury protection which 2227 becomes effective before January 1, 2027, and whose policy does 2228 not meet minimum security requirements on or after January 1, 2229 2027, to change coverages so as to eliminate personal injury 2230 protection. Any reduction in the premium must be refunded by the 2231 insurer. The insurer may not impose on the insured an additional 2232 fee or charge that applies solely to a change in coverage; 2233 however, the insurer may charge an additional required premium 2234 that is actuarially indicated. 2235 (4)âBy October 1, 2026, each motor vehicle insurer shall 2236 provide notice of this section to each motor vehicle insurance 2237 policyholder who is subject to this section. The notice is 2238 subject to approval by the office and must clearly inform the 2239 policyholder that: 2240 (a)âThe Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law is repealed 2241 effective January 1, 2027, and that on or after that date, the 2242 insured is no longer required to maintain personal injury 2243 protection insurance coverage, that personal injury protection 2244 insurance coverage is no longer available for purchase in this 2245 state, and that new or renewal policies issued on or after that 2246 date will not contain that coverage. 2247 (b)âEffective January 1, 2027, a person subject to the 2248 financial responsibility requirements of s. 324.022 must 2249 maintain minimum security requirements that enable the person to 2250 respond in damages for liability on account of accidents arising 2251 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in 2252 the following amounts: 2253 1.âTwenty-five thousand dollars for bodily injury to, or 2254 the death of, one person in any one crash and, subject to such 2255 limits for one person, in the amount of $50,000 for bodily 2256 injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one 2257 crash; and 2258 2.âTen thousand dollars for damage to, or destruction of, 2259 the property of others in any one crash. 2260 (c)âBodily injury liability coverage protects the insured, 2261 up to the coverage limits, against loss if the insured is 2262 legally responsible for bodily injury to, or the death of, 2263 others in a motor vehicle crash. 2264 (d)âThe policyholder may obtain uninsured and underinsured 2265 motorist coverage that provides benefits, up to the limits of 2266 such coverage, to a policyholder or other insured entitled to 2267 recover damages for bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death 2268 resulting from a motor vehicle crash involving an uninsured or 2269 underinsured owner or operator of a motor vehicle. 2270 (e)âIf the policyholderâs new or renewal motor vehicle 2271 insurance policy is effective before January 1, 2027, and 2272 contains personal injury protection and property damage 2273 liability coverage as required by state law before January 1, 2274 2027, but does not meet minimum security requirements on or 2275 after January 1, 2027, the policy is deemed to meet minimum 2276 security requirements until it is renewed, nonrenewed, or 2277 canceled on or after January 1, 2027. 2278 (f)âA policyholder whose new or renewal policy becomes 2279 effective before January 1, 2027, but does not meet minimum 2280 security requirements on or after January 1, 2027, may change 2281 coverages under the policy so as to eliminate personal injury 2282 protection and to obtain coverage providing minimum security 2283 requirements, including bodily injury liability coverage, which 2284 are effective on or after January 1, 2027. 2285 (g)âIf the policyholder has any questions, he or she should 2286 contact the person named at the telephone number provided in the 2287 notice. 2288 Section 47.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 2289 627.728, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2290 627.728âCancellations; nonrenewals.â 2291 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 2292 (a)ââPolicyâ means the bodily injury and property damage 2293 liability, personal injury protection, medical payments, 2294 comprehensive, collision, and uninsured motorist coverage 2295 portions of a policy of motor vehicle insurance delivered or 2296 issued for delivery in this state: 2297 1.âInsuring a natural person as named insured or one or 2298 more related individuals who are residents resident of the same 2299 household; and 2300 2.âInsuring only a motor vehicle of the private passenger 2301 type or station wagon type which is not used as a public or 2302 livery conveyance for passengers or rented to others; or 2303 insuring any other four-wheel motor vehicle having a load 2304 capacity of 1,500 pounds or less which is not used in the 2305 occupation, profession, or business of the insured other than 2306 farming; other than any policy issued under an automobile 2307 insurance assigned risk plan or covering garage, automobile 2308 sales agency, repair shop, service station, or public parking 2309 place operation hazards. 2310 2311 The term âpolicyâ does not include a binder as defined in s. 2312 627.420 unless the duration of the binder period exceeds 60 2313 days. 2314 Section 48.âSubsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection 2315 (5), and subsections (6) and (7) of section 627.7295, Florida 2316 Statutes, are amended to read: 2317 627.7295âMotor vehicle insurance contracts.â 2318 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 2319 (a)ââPolicyâ means a motor vehicle insurance policy that 2320 provides bodily injury liability personal injury protection 2321 coverage and, property damage liability coverage, or both. 2322 (b)ââBinderâ means a binder that provides motor vehicle 2323 bodily injury liability coverage personal injury protection and 2324 property damage liability coverage. 2325 (5)(a)âA licensed general lines agent may charge a per 2326 policy fee of up to not to exceed $10 to cover the 2327 administrative costs of the agent associated with selling the 2328 motor vehicle insurance policy if the policy provides covers 2329 only bodily injury liability coverage personal injury protection 2330 coverage as provided by s. 627.736 and property damage liability 2331 coverage under as provided by s. 627.7275 and if no other 2332 insurance is sold or issued in conjunction with or collateral to 2333 the policy. The fee is not considered part of the premium. 2334 (6)âIf a motor vehicle ownerâs driver license, license 2335 plate, and registration have previously been suspended pursuant 2336 to s. 316.646 or s. 627.733, an insurer may cancel a new policy 2337 only as provided in s. 627.7275. 2338 (7)âA policy of private passenger motor vehicle insurance 2339 or a binder for such a policy may be initially issued in this 2340 state only if, before the effective date of such binder or 2341 policy, the insurer or agent has collected from the insured an 2342 amount equal to at least 1 monthâs premium. An insurer, agent, 2343 or premium finance company may not, directly or indirectly, take 2344 any action that will result resulting in the insured paying 2345 having paid from the insuredâs own funds an amount less than the 2346 1 monthâs premium required by this subsection. This subsection 2347 applies regardless of without regard to whether the premium is 2348 financed by a premium finance company or is paid pursuant to a 2349 periodic payment plan of an insurer or an insurance agent. 2350 (a)âThis subsection does not apply: 2351 1.âIf an insured or member of the insuredâs family is 2352 renewing or replacing a policy or a binder for such policy 2353 written by the same insurer or a member of the same insurer 2354 group. This subsection does not apply 2355 2.âTo an insurer that issues private passenger motor 2356 vehicle coverage primarily to active duty or former military 2357 personnel or their dependents. This subsection does not apply 2358 3.âIf all policy payments are paid pursuant to a payroll 2359 deduction plan, an automatic electronic funds transfer payment 2360 plan from the policyholder, or a recurring credit card or debit 2361 card agreement with the insurer. 2362 (b)âThis subsection and subsection (4) do not apply if: 2363 1.âAll policy payments to an insurer are paid pursuant to 2364 an automatic electronic funds transfer payment plan from an 2365 agent, a managing general agent, or a premium finance company 2366 and if the policy includes, at a minimum, bodily injury 2367 liability coverage and personal injury protection pursuant to 2368 ss. 627.730-627.7405; motor vehicle property damage liability 2369 coverage under pursuant to s. 627.7275; or and bodily injury 2370 liability in at least the amount of $10,000 because of bodily 2371 injury to, or death of, one person in any one accident and in 2372 the amount of $20,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of, 2373 two or more persons in any one accident. This subsection and 2374 subsection (4) do not apply if 2375 2.âAn insured has had a policy in effect for at least 6 2376 months, the insuredâs agent is terminated by the insurer that 2377 issued the policy, and the insured obtains coverage on the 2378 policyâs renewal date with a new company through the terminated 2379 agent. 2380 Section 49.âSection 627.7415, Florida Statutes, is amended 2381 to read: 2382 627.7415âCommercial motor vehicles; additional liability 2383 insurance coverage.âBeginning January 1, 2027, commercial motor 2384 vehicles, as defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01, operated upon 2385 the roads and highways of this state must shall be insured with 2386 the following minimum levels of combined bodily liability 2387 insurance and property damage liability insurance in addition to 2388 any other insurance requirements: 2389 (1)âSixty Fifty thousand dollars per occurrence for a 2390 commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 26,000 2391 pounds or more, but less than 35,000 pounds. 2392 (2)âOne hundred twenty thousand dollars per occurrence for 2393 a commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 35,000 2394 pounds or more, but less than 44,000 pounds. 2395 (3)âThree hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a 2396 commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 44,000 2397 pounds or more. 2398 (4)âAll commercial motor vehicles subject to regulations of 2399 the United States Department of Transportation, 49 C.F.R. part 2400 387, subparts A and B, and as may be hereinafter amended, shall 2401 be insured in an amount equivalent to the minimum levels of 2402 financial responsibility as set forth in such regulations. 2403 2404 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction, 2405 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 2406 Section 50.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 627.747, 2407 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2408 627.747âNamed driver exclusion.â 2409 (1)âA private passenger motor vehicle policy may exclude 2410 the following coverages for all claims or suits resulting from 2411 the operation of a motor vehicle by an identified individual who 2412 is not a named insured, provided the identified individual is 2413 named on the declarations page or by endorsement and the named 2414 insured consents in writing to such exclusion: 2415 (a)âNotwithstanding the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law, 2416 the personal injury protection coverage specifically applicable 2417 to the identified individualâs injuries, lost wages, and death 2418 benefits. 2419 (b)âProperty damage liability coverage. 2420 (b)(c)âBodily injury liability coverage, if required by law 2421 and purchased by the named insured. 2422 (c)(d)âUninsured motorist coverage for any damages 2423 sustained by the identified excluded individual, if the named 2424 insured has purchased such coverage. 2425 (d)(e)âAny coverage the named insured is not required by 2426 law to purchase. 2427 (3)âA driver excluded pursuant to this section must: 2428 (a)âestablish, maintain, and show proof of financial 2429 ability to respond for damages arising out of the ownership, 2430 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as required by chapter 2431 324; and 2432 (b)âMaintain security as required by s. 627.733. 2433 Section 51.âParagraphs (b), (c), and (g) of subsection (7), 2434 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (8), and paragraph (b) of 2435 subsection (16) of section 627.748, Florida Statutes, are 2436 amended to read: 2437 627.748âTransportation network companies.â 2438 (7)âTRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND TNC DRIVER INSURANCE 2439 REQUIREMENTS.â 2440 (b)âThe following automobile insurance requirements apply 2441 while a participating TNC driver is logged on to the digital 2442 network but is not engaged in a prearranged ride: 2443 1.âAutomobile insurance that provides: 2444 a.âA primary automobile liability coverage of at least 2445 $50,000 for death and bodily injury per person, $100,000 for 2446 death and bodily injury per incident, and $25,000 for property 2447 damage; and 2448 b.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 2449 minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405; 2450 and 2451 c.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 2452 by s. 627.727. 2453 2.âThe coverage requirements of this paragraph may be 2454 satisfied by any of the following: 2455 a.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or the 2456 TNC vehicle owner; 2457 b.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or 2458 c.âA combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b. 2459 (c)1.âThe TNC driver while following automobile insurance 2460 requirements apply while a TNC driver is engaged in a 2461 prearranged ride must maintain: 2462 1.âautomobile insurance that provides: 2463 a.âA Primary automobile liability coverage of at least $1 2464 million for death, bodily injury, and property damage; and 2465 b.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 2466 minimum coverage amounts required of a limousine under ss. 2467 627.730-627.7405; and 2468 c.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 2469 by s. 627.727. 2470 2.âThe coverage requirements of this paragraph may be 2471 satisfied by any of the following: 2472 a.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or the 2473 TNC vehicle owner; 2474 b.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or 2475 c.âA combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b. 2476 (g)âInsurance satisfying the requirements under this 2477 subsection is deemed to satisfy the financial responsibility 2478 requirement for a motor vehicle under chapter 324 and the 2479 security required under s. 627.733 for any period when the TNC 2480 driver is logged onto the digital network or engaged in a 2481 prearranged ride. 2482 (8)âTRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND INSURER; DISCLOSURE; 2483 EXCLUSIONS.â 2484 (a)âBefore a TNC driver is allowed to accept a request for 2485 a prearranged ride on the digital network, the TNC must disclose 2486 in writing to the TNC driver: 2487 1.âThe insurance coverage, including the types of coverage 2488 and the limits for each coverage, which the TNC provides while 2489 the TNC driver uses a TNC vehicle in connection with the TNCâs 2490 digital network. 2491 2.âThat the TNC driverâs own automobile insurance policy 2492 might not provide any coverage while the TNC driver is logged on 2493 to the digital network or is engaged in a prearranged ride, 2494 depending on the terms of the TNC driverâs own automobile 2495 insurance policy. 2496 3.âThat the provision of rides for compensation which are 2497 not prearranged rides subjects the driver to the coverage 2498 requirements imposed under s. 324.032(1) and (2) and that 2499 failure to meet such coverage requirements subjects the TNC 2500 driver to penalties provided in s. 324.221, up to and including 2501 a misdemeanor of the second degree. 2502 (b)1.âAn insurer that provides an automobile liability 2503 insurance policy under this part may exclude any and all 2504 coverage afforded under the policy issued to an owner or 2505 operator of a TNC vehicle while driving that vehicle for any 2506 loss or injury that occurs while a TNC driver is logged on to a 2507 digital network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged 2508 ride. Exclusions imposed under this subsection are limited to 2509 coverage while a TNC driver is logged on to a digital network or 2510 while a TNC driver provides a prearranged ride. This right to 2511 exclude all coverage may apply to any coverage included in an 2512 automobile insurance policy, including, but not limited to: 2513 a.âLiability coverage for bodily injury and property 2514 damage; 2515 b.âUninsured and underinsured motorist coverage; 2516 c.âMedical payments coverage; 2517 d.âComprehensive physical damage coverage; and 2518 e.âCollision physical damage coverage; and 2519 f.âPersonal injury protection. 2520 2.âThe exclusions described in subparagraph 1. apply 2521 notwithstanding any requirement under chapter 324. These 2522 exclusions do not affect or diminish coverage otherwise 2523 available for permissive drivers or resident relatives under the 2524 personal automobile insurance policy of the TNC driver or owner 2525 of the TNC vehicle who are not occupying the TNC vehicle at the 2526 time of loss. This section does not require that a personal 2527 automobile insurance policy provide coverage while the TNC 2528 driver is logged on to a digital network, while the TNC driver 2529 is engaged in a prearranged ride, or while the TNC driver 2530 otherwise uses a vehicle to transport riders for compensation. 2531 3.âThis section must not be construed to require an insurer 2532 to use any particular policy language or reference to this 2533 section in order to exclude any and all coverage for any loss or 2534 injury that occurs while a TNC driver is logged on to a digital 2535 network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged ride. 2536 4.âThis section does not preclude an insurer from providing 2537 primary or excess coverage for the TNC driverâs vehicle by 2538 contract or endorsement. 2539 (16)âLUXURY GROUND TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES.â 2540 (b)âAn entity may elect, upon written notification to the 2541 department, to be regulated as a luxury ground TNC. A luxury 2542 ground TNC must: 2543 1.âComply with all of the requirements of this section 2544 applicable to a TNC, including subsection (17), which do not 2545 conflict with subparagraph 2. or which do not prohibit the 2546 company from connecting riders to drivers who operate for-hire 2547 vehicles as defined in s. 320.01(15), including limousines and 2548 luxury sedans and excluding taxicabs. 2549 2.âMaintain insurance coverage as required by subsection 2550 (7). However, if a prospective luxury ground TNC satisfies 2551 minimum financial responsibility through compliance with s. 2552 324.032(3) s. 324.032(2) by using self-insurance when it gives 2553 the department written notification of its election to be 2554 regulated as a luxury ground TNC, the luxury ground TNC may use 2555 self-insurance to meet the insurance requirements of subsection 2556 (7), so long as such self-insurance complies with s. 324.032(3) 2557 s. 324.032(2) and provides the limits of liability required by 2558 subsection (7). 2559 Section 52.âSubsection (2) and paragraphs (a) and (c) of 2560 subsection (3) of section 627.7483, Florida Statutes, are 2561 amended to read: 2562 627.7483âPeer-to-peer car sharing; insurance requirements.â 2563 (2)âINSURANCE COVERAGE REQUIREMENTS.â 2564 (a)1.âA peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall ensure that, 2565 during each car-sharing period, the shared vehicle owner and the 2566 shared vehicle driver are insured under a motor vehicle 2567 insurance policy that provides all of the following: 2568 a.âProperty damage liability coverage and bodily injury 2569 liability coverage that meet or exceed meets the minimum 2570 coverage amounts required under s. 324.022. 2571 b.âBodily injury liability coverage limits as described in 2572 s. 324.021(7)(a) and (b). 2573 c.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 2574 minimum coverage amounts required under s. 627.736. 2575 d.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 2576 under s. 627.727. 2577 2.âThe peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall also ensure 2578 that the motor vehicle insurance policy under subparagraph 1.: 2579 a.âRecognizes that the shared vehicle insured under the 2580 policy is made available and used through a peer-to-peer car 2581 sharing program; or 2582 b.âDoes not exclude the use of a shared vehicle by a shared 2583 vehicle driver. 2584 (b)1.âThe insurance described under paragraph (a) may be 2585 satisfied by a motor vehicle insurance policy maintained by: 2586 a.âA shared vehicle owner; 2587 b.âA shared vehicle driver; 2588 c.âA peer-to-peer car-sharing program; or 2589 d.âA combination of a shared vehicle owner, a shared 2590 vehicle driver, and a peer-to-peer car-sharing program. 2591 2.âThe insurance policy maintained in subparagraph 1. which 2592 satisfies the insurance requirements under paragraph (a) is 2593 primary during each car-sharing period. If a claim occurs during 2594 the car-sharing period in another state with minimum financial 2595 responsibility limits higher than those limits required under 2596 chapter 324, the coverage maintained under paragraph (a) 2597 satisfies the difference in minimum coverage amounts up to the 2598 applicable policy limits. 2599 3.a.âIf the insurance maintained by a shared vehicle owner 2600 or shared vehicle driver in accordance with subparagraph 1. has 2601 lapsed or does not provide the coverage required under paragraph 2602 (a), the insurance maintained by the peer-to-peer car-sharing 2603 program must provide the coverage required under paragraph (a), 2604 beginning with the first dollar of a claim, and must defend such 2605 claim, except under circumstances as set forth in subparagraph 2606 (3)(a)2. 2607 b.âCoverage under a motor vehicle insurance policy 2608 maintained by the peer-to-peer car-sharing program must not be 2609 dependent on another motor vehicle insurer first denying a 2610 claim, and another motor vehicle insurance policy is not 2611 required to first deny a claim. 2612 c.âNotwithstanding any other law, statute, rule, or 2613 regulation to the contrary, a peer-to-peer car-sharing program 2614 has an insurable interest in a shared vehicle during the car 2615 sharing period. This sub-subparagraph does not create liability 2616 for a peer-to-peer car-sharing program for maintaining the 2617 coverage required under paragraph (a) and under this paragraph, 2618 if applicable. 2619 d.âA peer-to-peer car-sharing program may own and maintain 2620 as the named insured one or more policies of motor vehicle 2621 insurance which provide coverage for: 2622 (I)âLiabilities assumed by the peer-to-peer car-sharing 2623 program under a peerâtoâpeer car-sharing program agreement; 2624 (II)âLiability of the shared vehicle owner; 2625 (III)âLiability of the shared vehicle driver; 2626 (IV)âDamage or loss to the shared motor vehicle; or 2627 (V)âDamage, loss, or injury to persons or property to 2628 satisfy the personal injury protection and uninsured and 2629 underinsured motorist coverage requirements of this section. 2630 e.âInsurance required under paragraph (a), when maintained 2631 by a peer-to-peer car-sharing program, may be provided by an 2632 insurer authorized to do business in this state which is a 2633 member of the Florida Insurance Guaranty Association or an 2634 eligible surplus lines insurer that has a superior, excellent, 2635 exceptional, or equivalent financial strength rating by a rating 2636 agency acceptable to the office. A peer-to-peer car-sharing 2637 program is not transacting in insurance when it maintains the 2638 insurance required under this section. 2639 (3)âLIABILITIES AND INSURANCE EXCLUSIONS.â 2640 (a)âLiability.â 2641 1.âA peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall assume 2642 liability, except as provided in subparagraph 2., of a shared 2643 vehicle owner for bodily injury or property damage to third 2644 parties or uninsured and underinsured motorist or personal 2645 injury protection losses during the car-sharing period in an 2646 amount stated in the peer-to-peer car-sharing program agreement, 2647 which amount may not be less than those set forth in ss. 324.022 2648 and 627.727 ss. 324.021(7)(a) and (b), 324.022, 627.727, and 2649 627.736, respectively. 2650 2.âThe assumption of liability under subparagraph 1. does 2651 not apply if a shared vehicle owner: 2652 a.âMakes an intentional or fraudulent material 2653 misrepresentation or omission to the peer-to-peer car-sharing 2654 program before the car-sharing period in which the loss occurs; 2655 or 2656 b.âActs in concert with a shared vehicle driver who fails 2657 to return the shared vehicle pursuant to the terms of the peer 2658 to-peer car-sharing program agreement. 2659 3.âThe insurer, insurers, or peer-to-peer car-sharing 2660 program providing coverage under paragraph (2)(a) shall assume 2661 primary liability for a claim when: 2662 a.âA dispute exists over who was in control of the shared 2663 motor vehicle at the time of the loss, and the peer-to-peer car 2664 sharing program does not have available, did not retain, or 2665 fails to provide the information required under subsection (5); 2666 or 2667 b.âA dispute exists over whether the shared vehicle was 2668 returned to the alternatively agreed-upon location as required 2669 under subparagraph (1)(d)2. 2670 (c)âExclusions in motor vehicle insurance policies.âAn 2671 authorized insurer that writes motor vehicle liability insurance 2672 in this state may exclude any coverage and the duty to defend or 2673 indemnify for any claim under a shared vehicle ownerâs motor 2674 vehicle insurance policy, including, but not limited to: 2675 1.âLiability coverage for bodily injury and property 2676 damage; 2677 2.âPersonal injury protection coverage; 2678 3.âUninsured and underinsured motorist coverage; 2679 3.4.âMedical payments coverage; 2680 4.5.âComprehensive physical damage coverage; and 2681 5.6.âCollision physical damage coverage. 2682 2683 This paragraph does not invalidate or limit any exclusion 2684 contained in a motor vehicle insurance policy, including any 2685 insurance policy in use or approved for use which excludes 2686 coverage for motor vehicles made available for rent, sharing, or 2687 hire or for any business use. This paragraph does not 2688 invalidate, limit, or restrict an insurerâs ability under 2689 existing law to underwrite, cancel, or nonrenew any insurance 2690 policy. 2691 Section 53.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 2692 627.749, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2693 627.749âAutonomous vehicles; insurance requirements.â 2694 (2)âINSURANCE REQUIREMENTS.â 2695 (a)âA fully autonomous vehicle with the automated driving 2696 system engaged while logged on to an on-demand autonomous 2697 vehicle network or engaged in a prearranged ride must be covered 2698 by a policy of automobile insurance which provides: 2699 1.âPrimary liability coverage of at least $1 million for 2700 death, bodily injury, and property damage. 2701 2.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 2702 minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405. 2703 3.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 2704 under by s. 627.727. 2705 Section 54.âSection 627.8405, Florida Statutes, is amended 2706 to read: 2707 627.8405âProhibited acts; financing companies.âA No premium 2708 finance company shall, in a premium finance agreement or other 2709 agreement, may not finance the cost of or otherwise provide for 2710 the collection or remittance of dues, assessments, fees, or 2711 other periodic payments of money for the cost of: 2712 (1)âA membership in an automobile club. The term 2713 âautomobile clubâ means a legal entity that which, in 2714 consideration of dues, assessments, or periodic payments of 2715 money, promises its members or subscribers to assist them in 2716 matters relating to the ownership, operation, use, or 2717 maintenance of a motor vehicle; however, the term this 2718 definition of âautomobile clubâ does not include persons, 2719 associations, or corporations which are organized and operated 2720 solely for the purpose of conducting, sponsoring, or sanctioning 2721 motor vehicle races, exhibitions, or contests upon racetracks, 2722 or upon racecourses established and marked as such for the 2723 duration of such particular events. As used in this subsection, 2724 the term words âmotor vehicleâ has used herein have the same 2725 meaning as defined in chapter 320. 2726 (2)âAn accidental death and dismemberment policy sold in 2727 combination with a policy providing only bodily injury liability 2728 coverage personal injury protection and property damage 2729 liability coverage only policy. 2730 (3)âAny product not regulated under the provisions of this 2731 insurance code. 2732 2733 This section also applies to premium financing by any insurance 2734 agent or insurance company under part XVI. The commission shall 2735 adopt rules to assure disclosure, at the time of sale, of 2736 coverages financed with personal injury protection and shall 2737 prescribe the form of such disclosure. 2738 Section 55.âSubsection (1) of section 627.915, Florida 2739 Statutes, is amended to read: 2740 627.915âInsurer experience reporting.â 2741 (1)âEach insurer transacting private passenger motor 2742 vehicle automobile insurance in this state shall report certain 2743 information annually to the office. The information will be due 2744 on or before July 1 of each year. The information must shall be 2745 divided into the following categories: bodily injury liability; 2746 property damage liability; uninsured motorist; personal injury 2747 protection benefits; medical payments; and comprehensive and 2748 collision. The information given must shall be on direct 2749 insurance writings in the state alone and shall represent total 2750 limits data. The information set forth in paragraphs (a)-(f) is 2751 applicable to voluntary private passenger and Joint Underwriting 2752 Association private passenger writings and must shall be 2753 reported for each of the latest 3 calendar-accident years, with 2754 an evaluation date of March 31 of the current year. The 2755 information set forth in paragraphs (g)-(j) is applicable to 2756 voluntary private passenger writings and must shall be reported 2757 on a calendar-accident year basis ultimately seven times at 2758 seven different stages of development. 2759 (a)âPremiums earned for the latest 3 calendar-accident 2760 years. 2761 (b)âLoss development factors and the historic development 2762 of those factors. 2763 (c)âPolicyholder dividends incurred. 2764 (d)âExpenses for other acquisition and general expense. 2765 (e)âExpenses for agentsâ commissions and taxes, licenses, 2766 and fees. 2767 (f)âProfit and contingency factors as utilized in the 2768 insurerâs automobile rate filings for the applicable years. 2769 (g)âLosses paid. 2770 (h)âLosses unpaid. 2771 (i)âLoss adjustment expenses paid. 2772 (j)âLoss adjustment expenses unpaid. 2773 Section 56.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 628.909, 2774 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2775 628.909âApplicability of other laws.â 2776 (2)âThe following provisions of the Florida Insurance Code 2777 apply to captive insurance companies that who are not industrial 2778 insured captive insurance companies to the extent that such 2779 provisions are not inconsistent with this part: 2780 (a)âChapter 624, except for ss. 624.407, 624.408, 624.4085, 2781 624.40851, 624.4095, 624.411, 624.425, and 624.426. 2782 (b)âChapter 625, part II. 2783 (c)âChapter 626, part IX. 2784 (d)âSections 627.730-627.7405, when no-fault coverage is 2785 provided. 2786 (e)âChapter 628. 2787 (3)âThe following provisions of the Florida Insurance Code 2788 shall apply to industrial insured captive insurance companies to 2789 the extent that such provisions are not inconsistent with this 2790 part: 2791 (a)âChapter 624, except for ss. 624.407, 624.408, 624.4085, 2792 624.40851, 624.4095, 624.411, 624.425, 624.426, and 624.609(1). 2793 (b)âChapter 625, part II, if the industrial insured captive 2794 insurance company is incorporated in this state. 2795 (c)âChapter 626, part IX. 2796 (d)âSections 627.730-627.7405 when no-fault coverage is 2797 provided. 2798 (e)âChapter 628, except for ss. 628.341, 628.351, and 2799 628.6018. 2800 Section 57.âSubsections (2), (6), and (7) of section 2801 705.184, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2802 705.184âDerelict or abandoned motor vehicles on the 2803 premises of public-use airports.â 2804 (2)âThe airport director or the directorâs designee shall 2805 contact the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles to 2806 notify that department that the airport has possession of the 2807 abandoned or derelict motor vehicle and to determine the name 2808 and address of the owner of the motor vehicle, the insurance 2809 company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding the 2810 provisions of s. 627.736, and any person who has filed a lien on 2811 the motor vehicle. Within 7 business days after receipt of the 2812 information, the director or the directorâs designee shall send 2813 notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner 2814 of the motor vehicle, the insurance company insuring the motor 2815 vehicle, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, and all 2816 persons of record claiming a lien against the motor vehicle. The 2817 notice must shall state the fact of possession of the motor 2818 vehicle, that charges for reasonable towing, storage, and 2819 parking fees, if any, have accrued and the amount thereof, that 2820 a lien as provided in subsection (6) will be claimed, that the 2821 lien is subject to enforcement pursuant to law, that the owner 2822 or lienholder, if any, has the right to a hearing as set forth 2823 in subsection (4), and that any motor vehicle which, at the end 2824 of 30 calendar days after receipt of the notice, has not been 2825 removed from the airport upon payment in full of all accrued 2826 charges for reasonable towing, storage, and parking fees, if 2827 any, may be disposed of as provided in s. 705.182(2)(a), (b), 2828 (d), or (e), including, but not limited to, the motor vehicle 2829 being sold free of all prior liens after 35 calendar days after 2830 the time the motor vehicle is stored if any prior liens on the 2831 motor vehicle are more than 5 years of age or after 50 calendar 2832 days after the time the motor vehicle is stored if any prior 2833 liens on the motor vehicle are 5 years of age or less. 2834 (6)âThe airport pursuant to this section or, if used, a 2835 licensed independent wrecker company pursuant to s. 713.78 shall 2836 have a lien on an abandoned or derelict motor vehicle for all 2837 reasonable towing, storage, and accrued parking fees, if any, 2838 except that a no storage fee may not shall be charged if the 2839 motor vehicle is stored less than 6 hours. As a prerequisite to 2840 perfecting a lien under this section, the airport director or 2841 the directorâs designee must serve a notice in accordance with 2842 subsection (2) on the owner of the motor vehicle, the insurance 2843 company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding the 2844 provisions of s. 627.736, and all persons of record claiming a 2845 lien against the motor vehicle. If attempts to notify the owner, 2846 the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle, 2847 notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, or lienholders are 2848 not successful, the requirement of notice by mail is shall be 2849 considered met. Serving of the notice does not dispense with 2850 recording the claim of lien. 2851 (7)(a)âFor the purpose of perfecting its lien under this 2852 section, the airport shall record a claim of lien which states 2853 shall state: 2854 1.âThe name and address of the airport. 2855 2.âThe name of the owner of the motor vehicle, the 2856 insurance company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding 2857 the provisions of s. 627.736, and all persons of record claiming 2858 a lien against the motor vehicle. 2859 3.âThe costs incurred from reasonable towing, storage, and 2860 parking fees, if any. 2861 4.âA description of the motor vehicle sufficient for 2862 identification. 2863 (b)âThe claim of lien must shall be signed and sworn to or 2864 affirmed by the airport director or the directorâs designee. 2865 (c)âThe claim of lien is shall be sufficient if it is in 2866 substantially the following form: 2867 2868 CLAIM OF LIEN 2869 State of ........ 2870 County of ........ 2871 Before me, the undersigned notary public, personally appeared 2872 ........, who was duly sworn and says that he/she is the 2873 ........ of ............, whose address is........; and that the 2874 following described motor vehicle: 2875 ...(Description of motor vehicle)... 2876 owned by ........, whose address is ........, has accrued 2877 $........ in fees for a reasonable tow, for storage, and for 2878 parking, if applicable; that the lienor served its notice to the 2879 owner, the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle 2880 notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, Florida Statutes, 2881 and all persons of record claiming a lien against the motor 2882 vehicle on ...., ...(year)..., by......... 2883 ...(Signature)... 2884 Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this .... day of 2885 ...., ...(year)..., by ...(name of person making statement).... 2886 ...(Signature of Notary Public)... ...(Print, Type, or Stamp 2887 Commissioned name of Notary Public)... 2888 Personally Known....OR Produced....as identification. 2889 2890 However, the negligent inclusion or omission of any information 2891 in this claim of lien which does not prejudice the owner does 2892 not constitute a default that operates to defeat an otherwise 2893 valid lien. 2894 (d)âThe claim of lien must shall be served on the owner of 2895 the motor vehicle, the insurance company insuring the motor 2896 vehicle, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, and all 2897 persons of record claiming a lien against the motor vehicle. If 2898 attempts to notify the owner, the insurance company insuring the 2899 motor vehicle notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, or 2900 lienholders are not successful, the requirement of notice by 2901 mail is shall be considered met. The claim of lien must shall be 2902 so served before recordation. 2903 (e)âThe claim of lien must shall be recorded with the clerk 2904 of court in the county where the airport is located. The 2905 recording of the claim of lien is shall be constructive notice 2906 to all persons of the contents and effect of such claim. The 2907 lien attaches shall attach at the time of recordation and takes 2908 shall take priority as of that time. 2909 Section 58.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (4) 2910 of section 713.78, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2911 713.78âLiens for recovering, towing, or storing vehicles 2912 and vessels.â 2913 (4)(a)âA towing-storage operator who comes into possession 2914 of a vehicle or vessel pursuant to paragraph (2)(b), and who 2915 claims a lien for recovery, towing, or storage services, must 2916 give notice, by certified mail, pursuant to subsection (16), to 2917 the registered owner, the insurance company insuring the vehicle 2918 or vessel notwithstanding s. 627.736, and all persons claiming a 2919 lien thereon, as disclosed by the records in the Department of 2920 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles or as disclosed by the records 2921 of any corresponding agency in any other state in which the 2922 vehicle or vessel is identified through a records check of the 2923 National Motor Vehicle Title Information System or an equivalent 2924 commercially available system as being titled or registered. 2925 (b)âWhen a law enforcement agency, county, or municipality 2926 authorizes the removal of a vehicle or vessel, or a towing 2927 service, garage, repair shop, or automotive service, storage, or 2928 parking place notifies a law enforcement agency of possession of 2929 a vehicle or vessel pursuant to s. 715.07(2)(a)2., if an 2930 approved third-party service cannot obtain the vehicleâs or 2931 vesselâs owner, lienholder, and insurer information or last 2932 state of record pursuant to subsection (16), then the person in 2933 charge of the towing service, garage, repair shop, or automotive 2934 service, storage, or parking place must request such information 2935 from the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction where the 2936 vehicle or vessel is stored. The law enforcement agency to which 2937 the request was made must contact the Department of Highway 2938 Safety and Motor Vehicles, or the appropriate agency of the 2939 state of registration, if known, within 24 hours through the 2940 medium of electronic communications, giving the full description 2941 of the vehicle or vessel. Upon receipt of the full description 2942 of the vehicle or vessel, the department must search its files 2943 to determine the ownerâs name, the insurance company insuring 2944 the vehicle or vessel, and whether any person has filed a lien 2945 upon the vehicle or vessel as provided in s. 319.27(2) and (3) 2946 and notify the applicable law enforcement agency within 72 2947 hours. The person in charge of the towing service, garage, 2948 repair shop, or automotive service, storage, or parking place 2949 must request such information from the applicable law 2950 enforcement agency within 5 days after the date of storage and 2951 must provide the information to the approved third-party service 2952 in order to transmit notices as required under subsection (16). 2953 The department may release the insurance company information to 2954 the requestor notwithstanding s. 627.736. 2955 (c)âThe notice of lien must be sent by an approved third 2956 party service by certified mail to the registered owner, the 2957 insurance company insuring the vehicle notwithstanding s. 2958 627.736, and all other persons claiming a lien thereon within 5 2959 business days, excluding a Saturday, Sunday, or federal legal 2960 holiday, after the date of storage of the vehicle or vessel. The 2961 notice must state all of the following: 2962 1.âIf the claim of lien is for a vehicle, the last 8 digits 2963 of the vehicle identification number of the vehicle subject to 2964 the lien, or, if the claim of lien is for a vessel, the hull 2965 identification number of the vessel subject to the lien, clearly 2966 printed in the delivery address box and on the outside of the 2967 envelope sent to the registered owner and all other persons 2968 claiming an interest in or lien on the vehicle or vessel. 2969 2.âThe name, physical address, and telephone number of the 2970 lienor, and the entity name, as registered with the Division of 2971 Corporations, of the business where the towing and storage 2972 occurred, which must also appear on the outside of the envelope 2973 sent to the registered owner and all other persons claiming an 2974 interest in or lien on the vehicle or vessel. 2975 3.âThe fact of possession of the vehicle or vessel. 2976 4.âThe name of the person or entity that authorized the 2977 lienor to take possession of the vehicle or vessel. 2978 5.âThat a lien as provided in paragraph (2)(b) is claimed. 2979 6.âThat charges have accrued and include an itemized 2980 statement of the amount thereof. 2981 7.âThat the lien is subject to enforcement under law and 2982 that the owner or lienholder, if any, has the right to initiate 2983 judicial proceedings as set forth in subsection (5). 2984 8.âThat any vehicle or vessel that remains unclaimed, or 2985 for which the charges for recovery, towing, or storage services 2986 remain unpaid, may be sold free of all prior liens 35 days after 2987 the vehicle or vessel is stored by the lienor if the vehicle or 2988 vessel is an older model or 57 days after the vehicle or vessel 2989 is stored by the lienor if the vehicle or vessel is a newer 2990 model. 2991 9.âThe address at which the vehicle or vessel is physically 2992 located. 2993 Section 59.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraph (c) 2994 of subsection (7), paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection 2995 (8), and subsections (9) and (10) of section 817.234, Florida 2996 Statutes, are amended to read: 2997 817.234âFalse and fraudulent insurance claims.â 2998 (1)(a)âA person commits insurance fraud punishable as 2999 provided in subsection (11) if that person, with the intent to 3000 injure, defraud, or deceive any insurer: 3001 1.âPresents or causes to be presented any written or oral 3002 statement as part of, or in support of, a claim for payment or 3003 other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy or a health 3004 maintenance organization subscriber or provider contract, 3005 knowing that such statement contains any false, incomplete, or 3006 misleading information concerning any fact or thing material to 3007 such claim; 3008 2.âPrepares or makes any written or oral statement that is 3009 intended to be presented to an any insurer in connection with, 3010 or in support of, any claim for payment or other benefit 3011 pursuant to an insurance policy or a health maintenance 3012 organization subscriber or provider contract, knowing that such 3013 statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading 3014 information concerning any fact or thing material to such claim; 3015 3.a.âKnowingly presents, causes to be presented, or 3016 prepares or makes with knowledge or belief that it will be 3017 presented to an any insurer, a purported insurer, a servicing 3018 corporation, an insurance broker, or an insurance agent, or any 3019 employee or agent thereof, any false, incomplete, or misleading 3020 information or a written or oral statement as part of, or in 3021 support of, an application for the issuance of, or the rating 3022 of, any insurance policy, or a health maintenance organization 3023 subscriber or provider contract; or 3024 b.âKnowingly conceals information concerning any fact 3025 material to such application; or 3026 4.âKnowingly presents, causes to be presented, or prepares 3027 or makes with knowledge or belief that it will be presented to 3028 any insurer a claim for payment or other benefit under medical 3029 payments coverage in a motor vehicle a personal injury 3030 protection insurance policy if the person knows that the payee 3031 knowingly submitted a false, misleading, or fraudulent 3032 application or other document when applying for licensure as a 3033 health care clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a 3034 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with part X of 3035 chapter 400. 3036 (7) 3037 (c)âAn insurer, or any person acting at the direction of or 3038 on behalf of an insurer, may not change an opinion in a mental 3039 or physical report prepared under s. 627.736(7) or direct the 3040 physician preparing the report to change such opinion; however, 3041 this provision does not preclude the insurer from calling to the 3042 attention of the physician errors of fact in the report based 3043 upon information in the claim file. Any person who violates this 3044 paragraph commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 3045 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 3046 (8)(a)âIt is unlawful for any person intending to defraud 3047 any other person to solicit or cause to be solicited any 3048 business from a person involved in a motor vehicle accident for 3049 the purpose of making, adjusting, or settling motor vehicle tort 3050 claims or claims for benefits under medical payments coverage in 3051 a motor vehicle insurance policy. A personal injury protection 3052 benefits required by s. 627.736. Any person who violates the 3053 provisions of this paragraph commits a felony of the second 3054 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 3055 775.084. A person who is convicted of a violation of this 3056 subsection must shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 3057 imprisonment of 2 years. 3058 (b)âA person may not solicit or cause to be solicited any 3059 business from a person involved in a motor vehicle accident by 3060 any means of communication other than advertising directed to 3061 the public for the purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims 3062 or claims for benefits under medical payments coverage in a 3063 motor vehicle insurance policy personal injury protection 3064 benefits required by s. 627.736, within 60 days after the 3065 occurrence of the motor vehicle accident. A Any person who 3066 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third degree, 3067 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 3068 (c)âA lawyer, health care practitioner as defined in s. 3069 456.001, or owner or medical director of a clinic required to be 3070 licensed pursuant to s. 400.9905 may not, at any time after 60 3071 days have elapsed from the occurrence of a motor vehicle 3072 accident, solicit or cause to be solicited any business from a 3073 person involved in a motor vehicle accident by means of in 3074 person or telephone contact at the personâs residence, for the 3075 purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims or claims for 3076 benefits under medical payments coverage in a motor vehicle 3077 insurance policy. A personal injury protection benefits required 3078 by s. 627.736. Any person who violates this paragraph commits a 3079 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 3080 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 3081 (9)âA person may not organize, plan, or knowingly 3082 participate in an intentional motor vehicle crash or a scheme to 3083 create documentation of a motor vehicle crash that did not occur 3084 for the purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims or claims 3085 for benefits under medical payments coverage in a motor vehicle 3086 insurance policy. A personal injury protection benefits as 3087 required by s. 627.736. Any person who violates this subsection 3088 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in 3089 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. A person who is convicted 3090 of a violation of this subsection must shall be sentenced to a 3091 minimum term of imprisonment of 2 years. 3092 (10)âA licensed health care practitioner who is found 3093 guilty of insurance fraud under this section for an act relating 3094 to a motor vehicle personal injury protection insurance policy 3095 must lose loses his or her license to practice for 5 years and 3096 may not receive reimbursement under medical payments coverage in 3097 a motor vehicle insurance policy for personal injury protection 3098 benefits for 10 years from the date that his or her license is 3099 suspended. 3100 Section 60.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 3101 $83,651 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the Insurance 3102 Regulatory Trust Fund to the Office of Insurance Regulation for 3103 the purpose of implementing this act. This section shall take 3104 effect July 1, 2026. 3105 Section 61.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 3106 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 3107 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect January 1, 3108 2027.